Strona główna
Pomoc
Polityka prywatności
FAQ i Pomoc
Pierwsze kroki
Rejestracja
Zakupy bez rejestracji
Zmiana loginu i hasła
Dostawa i płatność
Czas realizacji
Formy płatności
Warunki dostawy
Dostawa kurierem
Click & Collect
Paczkomaty 24/7
Punkty odbioru
Wszystko o zamówieniu
Składanie zamówienia
Statusy zamówień i paczek
Historia zamówień
Modyfikacja zamówienia
Kody rabatowe
Reklamacja i zwroty
Reklamacje
Zwroty i wymiany produktów zakupionych w sieci smyk
Regulaminy, dane, kontakt
Regulamin sklepu
Regulaminy promocji
Regulamin kart podarunkowych
Polityka prywatności
Ochrona danych osobowych
Zmień ustawienia prywatności
Recenzje
Informacja o opakowaniach oraz o zużytym sprzęcie elektrycznym i elektronicznym
Komunikaty
Nasze oznaczenia
Deklaracje zgodności
Kontakt
POLITYKA PRYWATNOŚCI SMYK S.A.
Korzystając z naszych usług, w tym odwiedzając nasze sklepy stacjonarne, stronę internetową smyk.com, korzystając z aplikacji mobilnej smyk lub kontaktując się z nami możesz przekazywać nam swoje dane osobowe. Przywiązujemy dużą wagę do ich ochrony i dbamy o Twoją prywatność. Dokument, który czytasz zawiera informacje o zasadach, na jakich przetwarzamy Twoje dane osobowe i przysługujących Ci w związku z tym uprawnieniach.
Twoje dane osobowe przetwarzamy z zachowaniem wymogów wynikających z Rozporządzenia Parlamentu Europejskiego i Rady (UE) 2016/679 z 27 kwietnia 2016 roku w sprawie ochrony osób fizycznych w związku z przetwarzaniem danych osobowych i w sprawie swobodnego przepływu takich danych oraz uchylenia dyrektywy 95/46/WE (ogólne rozporządzenie o ochronie danych) (dalej:
„RODO”
).
Zapoznaj się z poniższą polityką prywatności, aby poznać zasady na jakich przetwarzamy Twoje dane osobowe.
I. DANE ADMINISTRATORA ORAZ INSPEKTORA OCHRONY DANYCH
Administratorem Twoich danych osobowych jest spółka SMYK S.A. z siedzibą w Warszawie, pod adresem ul.
Domaniewska 48, 02-672 Warszawa, wpisana do Krajowego Rejestru Sądowego prowadzonego przez Sąd
Rejonowy dla miasta Warszawy, XIII Wydział Gospodarczy Krajowego Rejestru Sądowego pod numerem KRS
0000643442, kapitał zakładowy 303.827.571        PLN,           NIP 525-21-59-820, BDO 000011599
(dalej:
„Smyk”
lub
„My”
).
Możesz skontaktować się z nami w jeden z następujących sposobów:
prześlij email na adres: mojedane@smyk.com,
zadzwoń pod numer +48 22 448 00 00, lub wyślij zgłoszenie przez formularz kontaktowy na stronie https://www.smyk.com/contacts wybierając temat: ochrona danych osobowych, lub
•
wyślij list na adres: Smyk S.A., ul. Domaniewska 48, 02-672 Warszawa (najlepiej z dopiskiem „Dane Osobowe”).
Wyznaczyliśmy w Smyk Inspektora Ochrony Danych, którym jest Piotr Dąbrowski. Inspektor jest osobą, z którą możesz kontaktować się we wszelkich sprawach związanych z przetwarzaniem Twoich danych osobowych. Aby skontaktować się z Inspektorem Ochrony Danych:
prześlij email na adres: dpo@smyk.com lub
wyślij list na adres: Smyk S.A., ul. Domaniewska 48, 02-672 Warszawa (najlepiej z dopiskiem
„Inspektor Ochrony Danych”).
II. CEL I PODSTAWA PRAWNA PRZETWARZANIA DANYCH OSOBOWYCH
Poniżej możesz dowiedzieć się, w jakim celu i na jakiej podstawie prawnej Smyk może przetwarzać Twoje dane osobowe, w zależności od okoliczności.
1. DANE UŻYTKOWNIKÓW STRONY INTERNETOWEJ SMYK.COM
Dane osobowe osób korzystających ze strony internetowej smyk.com to jest adres IP, identyfikator użytkownika, informacje o urządzeniach i przeglądarce, z których następuje dostęp, informacje gromadzone za pomocą plików cookies oraz konwersji rozszerzonych (w szczególności dane oraz informacje o zdarzeniach takich jak np. odwiedzenia stron produktowych, kliknięcia w produkt, kupno produktu, dodanie do koszyka, dodanie do schowka, dodanie recenzji i zamówieniach) zapisane w logach systemowych przetwarzane są:
w celu świadczenia przez Smyk usług drogą elektroniczną za pośrednictwem strony internetowej smyk.com: w tym, udostępniania treści na stronie internetowej, rejestracji i prowadzenia konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, składania zamówień, udostępniania formularzy kontaktowych, oraz obsługi reklamacji dotyczących tych usług – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji umowy podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celu zapewnienia bezpieczeństwa usług świadczonych przez nas drogą elektroniczną, w tym przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom, a także zapewnieniu poprawnego działania systemów wykorzystywanych do świadczenia tych usług - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje potrzebę zapewnienia bezpieczeństwa świadczonych przez nas usług, w tym przeciwdziałanie oszustwom i nadużyciom;
w celu prowadzenia przez nas pomiarów, badań i analiz, w tym analiz statystycznych, dla potrzeb badania skuteczności i udoskonalania naszej działalności - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust.1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności;
w celach marketingowych Smyk, opisanych szerzej w części III niniejszej polityki (
„Marketing bezpośredni, profilowanie i zautomatyzowane podejmowanie decyzji”
);
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
Dane zbierane są automatycznie w chwili wejścia na stronę internetową smyk.com i mają na celu dostosowanie parametrów technicznych oraz zawartości do możliwości oraz wymagań Twojego urządzenia lub Twoich preferencji. Pliki cookies zbierane są a konwersje rozszerzone wykorzystywane są zgodnie z preferencjami ustawień przeglądarki osób korzystających ze strony internetowej www.smyk.com albo zgodnie z wyborem dokonanym w oknie ustawień preferencji plików cookies i konwersji rozszerzonych pojawiającym się przy wejściu na stronę
internetową
www.smyk.com
lub poprzez wybór pola „ustawienia prywatności: w sekcji „Moje konto” na dole strony internetowej
www.smyk.co
m
.
Jeżeli nie życzysz sobie instalowania określonych kategorii plików cookies na Twoim urządzeniu lub wykorzystywania konwersji rozszerzonych powinieneś dokonać odpowiedniego wyboru w oknie ustawień preferencji plików cookies i konwersji rozszerzonych pojawiającym się przy wejściu na
stronę
internetową
www.smyk.com
lub poprzez wybór pola „ustawienia prywatności: w sekcji „Moje konto” na dole strony internetowej
www.smyk.com
albo zmodyfikować odpowiednio ustawienia swojej przeglądarki (więcej informacji w części XI punkt 1 niniejszej polityki (
„Cookies i inne narzędzia”
). Jeżeli ustawienia przeglądarki osoby korzystającej ze strony internetowej smyk.com nie pozwalają na instalację kategorii plików cookies koniecznych do prawidłowego wyświetlania strony internetowej
www.smyk.co
m
,
może ona nie działać poprawnie lub nie oferować pełnej funkcjonalności.
2.A. DANE OSÓB PRZETWARZANE W ZWIAZKU Z ZAMÓWIENIEM W SKLEPIE INTERNETOWYM SMYK.COM (BEZ REJESTRACJI LUB KORZYSTANIA Z KONTA W SKLEPIE INTERNETOWYM SMYK.COM)
Dane osobowe przetwarzane w związku z zamówieniem złożonym przez Ciebie w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, tj. numer zamówienia, numer paczki, numer faktury, imię, nazwisko, adres do faktury, adres do doręczenia (jeżeli wybierzesz doręczenie zamówienia pod wskazany adres), adres poczty elektronicznej, numer telefonu, nazwa firmy (jeśli dokonujesz zakupu na potrzeby firmy), numer NIP (jeśli dokonujesz zakupu na potrzeby firmy), numer karty podarunkowej (o ile używasz jej do opłacenia zamówionych produktów), informacje dotyczące wybranej przez Ciebie metody płatności (jeżeli zdecydowałeś się na opłacenie zamówienia z góry) - to jest identyfikator płatności lub numer karty podarunkowej wykorzystanej przez Ciebie do opłacenia zamówienia, informacje o cenie zamówionych produktów i kosztach dostawy, historia komunikacji mailowej i SMS pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk, wybrane informacje gromadzone za pomocą plików
cookies
przetwarzane są:
w celu zawarcia, ukształtowania treści, zmiany i rozwiązania umowy sprzedaży zawartej na odległość, której przedmiotem jest realizacja składanych przez Ciebie zamówień na produkty znajdujące się w asortymencie sklepu internetowego smyk.com a także w celu prawidłowego wykonania tej umowy - jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla zawarcia, a następnie realizacji umowy, podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO;
w celu rozpatrywania składanych przez Ciebie reklamacji bądź oświadczenia o odstąpieniu od umowy
sprzedaży
zawartej na odległość – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako na sprzedającym podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO w związku z przepisami kodeksu cywilnego o rękojmi lub z regulacjami dotyczącymi praw konsumenta;
w celu przeprocesowania dokonanego przez Ciebie zwrotu towaru zakupionego w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, w zakresie w jakim nie jest to zwrot dokonywany w wyniku odstąpienia od umowy zawartej na odległość (to jest zwrotu dokonanego na zasadach określonych w § 11 Regulaminu sklepu internetowego smyk.com) - jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla realizacji umowy podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO;
w celu obsługi innych zgłoszeń lub zapytań, które możesz do nas kierować w związku z zamówieniem w sklepie internetowym smyk.com - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość udzielania odpowiedzi na kierowane do nas zgłoszenia;
w celu wywiązania się z obowiązków nałożonych na nas przepisami prawa, w tym przez ustawę o rachunkowości lub przepisy podatkowe (w zakresie dotyczącym wystawiania i przechowywania faktur oraz dokumentów księgowych) – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako na sprzedającym podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust 1 lit. c) RODO;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust 1. lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celach związanych z funkcjonowaniem i obsługą strony internetowej www.smyk.com, opisanych w części II punkt 1 niniejszej polityki („
Dane użytkowników strony internetowej smyk.com
”), jeżeli korzystasz ze sklepu internetowego smyk.com za pośrednictwem strony internetowej www.
smyk.co
m
;
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
Dane wymagane w celu złożenia zamówienia w sklepie internetowym smyk.com oznaczone są jako obowiązkowe, a ich niepodanie uniemożliwia złożenie zamówienia. Podanie pozostałych danych jest dobrowolne, zaś ich niepodanie nie wpływa na możliwość złożenia zamówienia.
2.B. DANE OSÓB PRZETWARZANE W ZWIAZKU Z ZAMÓWIENIEM W SKLEPIE INTERNETOWYM SMYK.COM (ZA POŚREDNICTWEM APLIKACJI OPEN-APP)
Dane osobowe przetwarzane w związku z zamówieniem złożonym przez Ciebie w sklepie internetowym smyk.com za pośrednictwem aplikacji open-app, tj. numer zamówienia, numer paczki, numer faktury, imię, nazwisko, adres do faktury, adres do doręczenia (jeżeli wybierzesz doręczenie zamówienia pod wskazany adres), adres poczty elektronicznej, numer telefonu, nazwa firmy (jeśli dokonujesz zakupu na potrzeby firmy), numer NIP (jeśli dokonujesz zakupu na potrzeby firmy), informacje dotyczące wybranej przez Ciebie metody płatności (jeżeli zdecydowałeś się na opłacenie zamówienia z góry) - to jest identyfikator płatności lub numer karty podarunkowej wykorzystanej przez Ciebie do opłacenia zamówienia, informacje o cenie zamówionych produktów i kosztach dostawy, historia komunikacji mailowej i SMS pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk, wybrane informacje gromadzone za pomocą plików
cookies
przetwarzane są:
w celu zawarcia, ukształtowania treści, zmiany i rozwiązania umowy sprzedaży zawartej na odległość, której przedmiotem jest realizacja składanych przez Ciebie zamówień na produkty znajdujące się w asortymencie sklepu internetowego smyk.com a także w celu prawidłowego wykonania tej umowy  - jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla zawarcia, a następnie realizacji umowy, podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO;
w celu rozpatrywania składanych przez Ciebie reklamacji bądź oświadczenia o odstąpieniu od umowy sprzedaży zawartej na odległość – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako na sprzedającym podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO w związku z przepisami kodeksu cywilnego o rękojmi lub z regulacjami dotyczącymi praw konsumenta;
w celu przeprocesowania dokonanego przez Ciebie zwrotu towaru zakupionego w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, w zakresie w jakim nie jest to zwrot dokonywany w wyniku odstąpienia od umowy zawartej na odległość (to jest zwrotu dokonanego na zasadach określonych w § 11 Regulaminu sklepu internetowego smyk.com) - jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla realizacji umowy podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO;
w celu obsługi innych zgłoszeń lub zapytań, które możesz do nas kierować w związku z zamówieniem w sklepie internetowym smyk.com - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość udzielania odpowiedzi na kierowane do nas zgłoszenia;
w celu wywiązania się z obowiązków nałożonych na nas przepisami prawa, w tym przez ustawę o rachunkowości lub przepisy podatkowe (w zakresie dotyczącym wystawiania i przechowywania faktur oraz dokumentów księgowych) – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do
wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako na sprzedającym podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celach związanych z funkcjonowaniem i obsługą strony internetowej www.smyk.com, opisanych w części II punkt 1 niniejszej polityki („
Dane użytkowników strony internetowej smyk.com
”), jeżeli korzystasz ze sklepu internetowego smyk.com za pośrednictwem strony internetowej www.
smyk.co
m
;
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
Dane wymagane w celu złożenia zamówienia w sklepie internetowym smyk.com oznaczone są jako obowiązkowe, a ich niepodanie uniemożliwia złożenie zamówienia. Podanie pozostałych danych jest dobrowolne, zaś ich niepodanie nie wpływa na możliwość złożenia zamówienia.
Dane osobowe przetwarzane w związku z zamówieniem złożonym przez Ciebie w sklepie internetowym smyk.com za pośrednictwem aplikacji open-app otrzymamy od odrębnego administratora tych danych osobowych tj. OpenApp Pay sp. z o. o. z siedzibą w Warszawie („
OpenApp
"). Przekazanie danych osobowych będzie odbywało się na podstawie umowy pomiędzy OpenApp a nami w związku z umową zawartą pomiędzy OpenApp a Tobą.
3. DANE OSÓB, KTÓRE REJESTRUJĄ SIĘ (ZAKŁADAJĄ KONTO) W SKLEPIE INTERNETOWYM SMYK.COM
Dane osobowe, które:
nam podajesz rejestrując konto w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, tj. adres poczty elektronicznej (dana wymagana do rejestracji) jak również numer telefonu (dana dodatkowa, którą możesz podać podczas rejestracji konta lub później),
możesz nam podać dodatkowo po zarejestrowaniu konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, tj. Twoje imię i nazwisko, data urodzenia, kod pocztowy, ponadto adres zamieszkania, jak również imiona, płeć oraz daty urodzenia Twoich dzieci,
nam podajesz zamieszczając w sklepie internetowym smyk.com recenzję produktu, tj. Twój pseudonim (nick), pod którym recenzja ma zostać opublikowana oraz Twoja opinia wyrażona w treści recenzji (dane wymagane do zamieszczenia recenzji), jak również nazwa miejscowości
(dana dodatkowa, którą możesz podać podczas zamieszczania recenzji),
a także
pozyskane przez nas w związku z korzystaniem przez Ciebie z zarejestrowanego konta, tj.
informacje o zamówieniach złożonych za pośrednictwem konta, zebranych puzzlach, otrzymanych lub wykorzystanych bonach, historia komunikacji mailowej i SMS pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk (wraz ze statusami doręczenia oraz informacją o kliknięciach w dostarczone linki) oraz wybrane informacje gromadzone za pomocą plików cookies,
przetwarzane są przez nas w następujących celach:
w celu zawarcia, ukształtowania treści, zmiany i rozwiązania umowy o świadczenie usług drogą elektroniczną, której przedmiotem jest prowadzenie przez Smyk konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com dla zarejestrowanych użytkowników jak również w celu prawidłowej realizacji usług świadczonych przez Smyk drogą elektroniczną na podstawie tej umowy użytkownikom zarejestrowanym na stronie internetowej smyk.com, w tym w zakresie przyznawania korzyści w ramach Smyk Klub w postaci puzzli i bonów, umożliwiania zamieszczania recenzji produktów, obsługi elektronicznej portmonetki (e-wallet) oraz zapewnienia Ci trybu postępowania reklamacyjnego dotyczącego tych usług (określonego w § 3 Regulaminu sklepu internetowego smyk.com) – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla realizacji umowy podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO;
w celu prawidłowego wykonania umowy o świadczenie usług drogą elektroniczną, której przedmiotem jest prowadzenie przez Smyk konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com dla zarejestrowanych użytkowników w zakresie umożliwienia Ci tworzenia i edytowania tzw. drzewa rodzinnego w ramach zarejestrowanego konta oraz uczczenia urodzin dziecka urodzinowym voucherem rabatowym przesłanym na Twój adres mailowy - o ile w ramach funkcjonalności konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, zwanego Smyk Klub („Smyk Klub”), będziesz tworzył tzw. drzewo rodzinne, a więc podasz nam dane osobowe swojego dziecka, tj. jego imię, płeć oraz datę urodzenia, i jednocześnie jako przedstawiciel ustawowy wyrazisz zgodę na przetwarzanie przez nas tych danych osobowych w określonych celach, dane te będziemy przetwarzać na podstawie udzielonej przez Ciebie zgody (art. 6 ust. 1 lit. a) RODO);
w celu rozpatrywania składanych przez Ciebie reklamacji bądź oświadczenia o odstąpieniu od umowy zawartej na odległość – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako świadczącym usługi drogą elektroniczną na podstawie umowy zawartej na odległość, podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c)
RODO w związku z regulacjami dotyczącymi praw konsumenta;
w celach związanych ze składanymi przez Ciebie za pośrednictwem Twojego konta zamówieniami na produkty znajdujące się w asortymencie sklepu internetowego smyk.com – odpowiednie zastosowanie mają cele opisane w części II punkt 2A niniejszej polityki (
„Dane osób przetwarzane w związku z zamówieniem w sklepie internetowym smyk.com (bez rejestracji lub korzystania z konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com )”
);
w celach związanych z funkcjonowaniem i obsługą strony internetowej smyk.com, opisanych w części II punkt 1 niniejszej polityki (
„Dane użytkowników strony internetowej smyk.com”
), jeżeli korzystasz ze sklepu internetowego smyk.com za pośrednictwem strony internetowej
www.smyk.com
;
w celach marketingowych Smyk, opisanych szerzej w części III niniejszej polityki
(
„Marketing bezpośredni, profilowanie i zautomatyzowane podejmowanie decyzji”);
w celu prowadzenia przez nas badań i analiz, w tym analiz statystycznych, dla potrzeb badania skuteczności i udoskonalania naszej działalności - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO), przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności i asortymentu oferowanych produktów;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
Dane wymagane w celu założenia (rejestracji) i utrzymania konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com oznaczone są jako obowiązkowe, a ich niepodanie uniemożliwia założenie konta. Podanie pozostałych danych jest dobrowolne, zaś ich niepodanie nie wpływa na możliwość założenia i utrzymania konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, może jednak uniemożliwić korzystanie z określonych funkcjonalności konta (np. brak możliwości tworzenia tzw. drzewa rodzinnego w ramach Smyk Klub w przypadku niepodania i niewyrażenia zgody na przetwarzanie danych osobowych dzieci). Żądanie usunięcia danych wymaganych do utrzymania konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com powoduje automatyczne usunięcie konta.
Jednocześnie zastrzegamy, iż jeżeli okazałoby się, że pomimo zapewnienia złożonego przez Ciebie podczas podawania danych osobowych dziecka w ramach konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, przetwarzamy dane dotyczące dziecka bez ważnej zgody jego przedstawiciela ustawowego, dane te zostaną przez nas niezwłocznie usunięte.
4. DANE UCZESTNIKÓW PROGRAMU LOJALNOŚCIOWEGO „SMYK KLUB” (KORZYSTAJĄCYCH Z KARTY NIEPOŁĄCZONEJ Z KONTEM W SKLEPIE INTERNETOWYM SMYK.COM)
Jeżeli jesteś osobą, która w przeszłości zarejestrowała się w programie lojalnościowym Smyk Klub (poprzednio „Smyk & Spółka”) wypełniając papierowy formularz rejestracyjny dostępny w sklepie Smyk oraz do dnia 5 stycznia 2025 r.  nie połączyłeś karty, za pośrednictwem której korzystasz z programu lojalnościowego, z kontem w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, a rejestrując się w programie podałeś nam swoje imię i nazwisko, datę urodzenia, płeć, numer telefonu, adres poczty elektronicznej (dane wymagane do rejestracji w papierowym formularzu rejestracyjnym) jak również adres zamieszkania, imiona, płeć, wiek i daty urodzenia dzieci oraz rodzaj Twojego pokrewieństwa z dziećmi (dane dodatkowe, które mogłeś podać podczas rejestracji w programie lub później), wówczas wymienione dane osobowe a także dane pozyskane przez nas w związku z Twoim uczestnictwem w programie, tj. informacje o dokonywanych przez Ciebie zakupach, zebranych puzzlach, otrzymanych lub wykorzystanych bonach, historia komunikacji mailowej i SMS pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk (wraz ze statusami doręczenia oraz informacją o kliknięciach w dostarczone linki) przetwarzane są przez nas w następujących celach:
w celu wykonania umowy dotyczącej Twojego uczestnictwa w programie „Smyk Klub” oraz prowadzenia i obsługi Twojej karty klubowicza zgodnie z Regulaminem Programu lojalnościowego „Smyk Klub” (dla Klubowiczów z kartą niepołączoną z kontem w sklepie internetowym smyk.com)  – jako że przetwarzanie Twoich danych jest niezbędne do zawarcia a następnie również wykonania tej umowy podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b)
RODO;
w celu wykonania umowy dotyczącej Twojego uczestnictwa w programie „Smyk Klub” oraz prowadzenia i obsługi Twojej karty klubowicza zgodnie z Regulaminem Programu lojalnościowego „Smyk Klub” (dla Klubowiczów z kartą niepołączoną z kontem w sklepie internetowym smyk.com) w zakresie umożliwienia Ci edytowania tzw. drzewa rodzinnego zapisanego na Twojej karcie klubowicza (tj. usuwania i zmiany danych dzieci dodanych przez Ciebie w przeszłości do struktury drzewa rodzinnego) oraz uczczenia urodzin dziecka urodzinowym voucherem rabatowym przesłanym na Twój adres e-mail - o ile w ramach programu lojalnościowego stworzyłeś tzw. drzewo rodzinne, a więc podałeś nam dane osobowe swojego dziecka, tj. jego imię, płeć, wiek i datę urodzenia, i jednocześnie jako przedstawiciel ustawowy wyraziłeś zgodę na przetwarzanie przez nas tych danych osobowych w określonych celach, dane te przetwarzamy na podstawie udzielonej przez Ciebie zgody (art. 6 ust. 1 lit. a) RODO); przy czym zastrzegamy, iż jeżeli okazałoby się, że pomimo zapewnienia złożonego przez Ciebie podczas podawania danych osobowych dziecka w ramach konta w programie, przetwarzamy dane dotyczące dziecka bez ważnej zgody jego rodzica lub opiekuna prawnego, dane te zostaną przez nas niezwłocznie usunięte;
w celu rozpatrywania składanych przez Ciebie zgłoszeń oraz reklamacji dotyczących programu – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako na usługodawcy, a także niezbędne do realizacji umowy uczestnictwa w programie podstawą prawną przetwarzania są art. 6 ust 1 lit. b) oraz lit. c) RODO;
w celach marketingowych Smyk, opisanych szerzej w części III niniejszej polityki („
Marketing
bezpośredni, profilowanie i zautomatyzowane podejmowanie decyzji
”);
w celu prowadzenia przez nas badań i analiz, w tym analiz statystycznych, dla potrzeb badania skuteczności i udoskonalania naszej działalności - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności i asortymentu oferowanych produktów;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
5. DANE SUBSKRYBENTÓW INFORMACJI HANDLOWYCH
Dane osobowe, które nam przekazujesz rejestrując się jako odbiorca informacji handlowych, tj. adres poczty elektronicznej (w przypadku subskrypcji email), lub numer telefonu (w przypadku subskrypcji SMS) oraz historia komunikacji mailowej lub SMS pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk (wraz ze statusami doręczenia oraz informacją o kliknięciach w dostarczone linki), wybrane informacje gromadzone za pomocą plików cookies przetwarzane są
w celu dostarczania Ci informacji handlowych, zawierających aktualne informacje o naszej ofercie i promocjach. Te informacje handlowe przesyłamy Ci w formie korespondencji e-mail lub wiadomości sms na podstawie udzielonej przez Ciebie (zgodnie z ustawą z dnia 12 lipca 2024 r. Prawo komunikacji elektronicznej)  zgody na otrzymywanie takich informacji oraz udostępnienie w tym celu identyfikującego Ciebie adresu email lub numeru telefonu. Jeżeli poprzez aplikację mobilną Smyk wyrazisz zgodę na otrzymywanie informacji handlowych w formie powiadomień push będziemy również pozyskiwać informacje o numerze identyfikacyjnym urządzenia, dla którego taka zgoda została wyrażona oraz o dacie ostatniego uruchomienia aplikacji mobilnej Smyk na tymże urządzeniu.
Wskazane powyżej dane osobowe subskrybentów informacji handlowych przetwarzane są:
w celu dostarczania Ci informacji handlowych, zawierających aktualne informacje o naszej ofercie i promocjach – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla realizacji umowy celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na możliwości podejmowania przez nas działań w zakresie marketingu bezpośredniego produktów i usług, znajdujących się w naszej ofercie;
w pozostałych celach marketingowych Smyk, opisanych szerzej w części III niniejszej polityki (
„Marketing bezpośredni, profilowanie i zautomatyzowane podejmowanie decyzji”
);
w celu prowadzenia przez nas badań i analiz, w tym analiz statystycznych, dla potrzeb badania skuteczności i udoskonalania naszej działalności i asortymentu produktów - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności i asortymentu oferowanych produktów;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes
Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
Podanie danych jest dobrowolne, ale niepodanie adresu email uniemożliwia otrzymywanie informacji handlowych w formie mailowej, a niepodanie numeru telefonu komórkowego uniemożliwia otrzymywanie informacji handlowych w formie SMS. Usunięcie danych wymaganych do otrzymywania korespondencji handlowej powoduje automatyczne wycofanie zgody na przekazywanie informacji handlowych.
6. DANE OSÓB KONTAKTUJĄCYCH SIĘ ZE SMYK
Kontaktując się z nami możesz przekazywać nam Twoje dane osobowe takie jak imię i nazwisko, numer telefonu, adres email, adres korespondencyjny oraz inne dane podane przez Ciebie podczas kontaktu, a w przypadku: a) kontaktu telefonicznego z naszym Centrum Obsługi Klienta także nagranie Twojego głosu, b) kontaktu za pomocą narzędzia typu „chat” lub „czatbot” także informacje, które podałeś podczas kontaktu również zanim nacisnąłeś przycisk „wyślij” lub analogiczny przycisk inicjujący wysłanie wiadomości, adres IP, informacje o urządzeniach oraz przeglądarce, z których następuje dostęp, ścieżka Twojego poruszania się po stronie smyk.com lub aplikacji przed rozpoczęciem konwersacji a także inne informacje dotyczące Twojej wizyty w tym czas przebywania na stronie smyk.com, informacje o wcześniej przeglądanych podstronach strony smyk.com, informacje liczbie wizyt na stronie smyk.com w okresie 90 dni, Twoje zamówienie oraz położenie Twojego kursora na stronie smyk.com. Dane pozyskane w trakcie kontaktu z Tobą przetwarzane są:
w celu prowadzenia korespondencji z nadawcami wiadomości oraz obsługi zgłoszeń kierowanych do Smyk, niezwiązanych z Twoją umową ze Smyk jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk obejmuje możliwość reagowania na kierowaną do Smyk komunikację;
w celu podjęcia na Twoje żądanie działań zmierzających do zawarcia umowy pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk lub wykonania umowy pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk, jeżeli w komunikacji wyrażasz chęć zawarcia ze Smyk umowy lub Twoja komunikacja dotyczy takiej umowy – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla zawarcia umowy, której chcesz być stroną lub realizacji umowy podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO;
w celu przedstawienia Ci informacji handlowych Smyk, jeżeli wyraźnie poprosisz o takie informacje komunikując się ze Smyk – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do podjęcia, na Twoje żądanie, działań przed zwarciem umowy podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) RODO.
w celu podjęcia działań zmierzających do zawarcia umowy pomiędzy Smyk a podmiotem w imieniu którego działasz, utrzymania bieżących kontaktów biznesowych z takim podmiotem, a także w celu wykonywania umów z nim zawartych, w sytuacji, gdy kontaktujesz się ze Smyk w cudzym imieniu – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk obejmuje możliwość negocjowania i wykonywania umów oraz utrzymywania kontaktów biznesowych z osobami działającymi w imieniu innych przedsiębiorców;
w celu monitorowania jakości usług świadczonych przez Centrum Obsługi Klienta Smyk, w tym jakości pracy konsultantów – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania przez nas informacji w celu polepszania jakości naszych usług, w tym zwłaszcza jakości obsługi klienta;
w celu prowadzenia przez nas pomiarów, badań i analiz otrzymywanych zgłoszeń, w tym analiz statystycznych, dla potrzeb badania skuteczności i udoskonalania naszej działalności - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności;
w celu wypełnienia obowiązku prawnego ciążącego na Smyk, jeżeli komunikacja dotyczy takiego obowiązku Smyk (np. w razie zgłoszeń reklamacyjnych lub zgłoszeń dotyczących danych osobowych) – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO;
w celu zapewnienia bezpieczeństwa świadczonych przez nas usług, w tym przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom, lub zarządzania ryzykiem - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje potrzebę zapewnienia bezpieczeństwa świadczonych przez nas usług, w tym przeciwdziałanie oszustwom i nadużyciom, a także zarządzanie ryzykiem naszej działalności;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwość ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
Szanując prywatność Twoją i innych osób, do których możesz odwołać się podczas komunikacji z nami, prosimy abyś w zgłoszeniu podawał nam tylko dane niezbędne do obsługi sprawy, z którą się do nas zwracasz. Jeżeli zamierzasz podać nam cudze dane osobowe, prosimy abyś wcześniej upewnił się czy istnieje podstawa prawna do przetwarzania tych danych przez Smyk (np. taką podstawą może być zgoda osoby, której dane dotyczą na przekazanie tych danych Smyk w celu obsługi sprawy, z którą się do nas zwracasz) oraz czy osoba której dane dotyczą jest świadoma zasad przetwarzania danych osobowych przez Smyk określonych w niniejszej polityce.
W zależności od sposobu komunikacji podanie danych kontaktowych w postaci adresu korespondencyjnego, adresu email lub numeru telefonu jest niezbędne do otrzymania odpowiedzi Smyk a ich niepodanie uniemożliwia przekazanie takiej odpowiedzi, podanie pozostałych danych jest dobrowolne, aczkolwiek, w zależności od rodzaju sprawy, z którą się do nas zwracasz, niepodanie dalszych informacji może uniemożliwić dalszą obsługę lub wydłużyć jej proces.
7. DANE OSOBOWE PRZETWARZANE PRZEZ SMYK W ZWIĄZKU Z PROFILAMI SMYK W
SERWISACH SPOŁECZNOŚCIOWYCH
Dane osobowe użytkowników serwisów społecznościowych (takich jak Facebook, Instagram lub YouTube), którzy wchodzą z nami w interakcje przy użyciu narzędzi udostępnionych przez te serwisy, tj.: obserwują nasz profil, udostępniają lub komentują nasze wpisy (w tym poprzez symbole udostępnione przez serwisy społecznościowe takie jak w szczególności ikonka „lubię to”) bądź kontaktują się z nami za pośrednictwem naszego profilu, a także dane osobowe innych osób zamieszczone przez użytkowników serwisów społecznościowych na naszych profilach (np. w komentarzu) są przetwarzane:
w celu prowadzenia profilu w mediach społecznościowych, w czym mieści się także zamieszczanie w ramach tego profilu informacji o naszej aktywności, wydarzeniach, które organizujemy, naszych produktach i usługach – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na promowaniu naszej marki oraz produktów i usług, budowaniu i utrzymaniu społeczności z nami związanej;
w celu komunikacji z zainteresowanymi użytkownikami serwisów społecznościowych za pośrednictwem udostępnianych przez te serwisy funkcjonalności (komentarze, chat, wiadomości) - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na możliwości komunikowania się z użytkownikami serwisów;
w celu analizowania danych statystycznych udostępnionych przez właścicieli serwisów społecznościowych za pośrednictwem oferowanych przez te serwisy funkcjonalności - jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwości pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków.
Zakres przetwarzanych przez nas danych odpowiada Twoim danym udostępnionym w Twoim profilu publicznym w danym serwisie społecznościowym oraz danych, które zdecydujesz się nam podać w komentarzu lub zgłoszeniu przesłanym za pomocą narzędzi komunikacyjnych udostępnionych przez ten serwis. Podanie danych jest dobrowolne, aczkolwiek ze względu na sposób działania serwisów społecznościowych dane zawarte w Twoim profilu publicznym są udostępniane użytkownikom, z którymi wchodzisz w interakcje w ramach danego serwisu społecznościowego.
Szanując prywatność Twoją i innych osób, do których możesz odwołać się w swojej wiadomości, prosimy abyś podawał nam tylko dane niezbędne do udzielenia odpowiedzi na Twoją wiadomość. Jeżeli zamierzasz w swojej wiadomości lub komentarzu podać cudze dane osobowe, w tym zamieścić zdjęcie przedstawiające inne osoby, prosimy abyś wcześniej upewnił się czy istnieje podstawa prawna do przetwarzania tych danych przez Smyk (np. taką podstawą może być zgoda osoby, której dane dotyczą na zamieszczenie tych danych na naszym profilu) oraz czy osoba której dane dotyczą jest świadoma zasad przetwarzania danych osobowych przez Smyk określonych w niniejszym dokumencie.
8. DANE OSOBOWE PRZETWARZANE W ZWIĄZKU Z MONITORINGIEM WIZYJNYM
Smyk prowadzi monitoring wizyjny wykorzystywanych przez siebie pomieszczeń, a w konsekwencji przetwarza dane osobowe osób przebywających w tych pomieszczeniach w celu zapewnienia bezpieczeństwa osób i ochrony mienia Smyk, zachowania w tajemnicy informacji, których ujawnienie mogłoby narazić Smyk na szkodę, a także w celu ustalenia i dochodzenia lub obrony przed roszczeniami obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom w związku z powyższym. Podstawą prawną prowadzenia monitoringu i związanego z nim przetwarzania danych osobowych jest prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk (art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO) polegający na zapewnieniu bezpieczeństwa osób, mienia, zachowania w tajemnicy określonych informacji, a także możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków.
Dane osobowe, jakie Smyk zbiera w ramach monitoringu, obejmują Twój wizerunek, a także informacje o Twoim zachowaniu w trakcie przebywania na terenie monitorowanym. Podanie danych osobowych utrwalonych w ramach monitoringu nie jest wymogiem ustawowym ani umownym i nie jest warunkiem zawarcia jakiejkolwiek umowy. Wejście na teren objęty monitoringiem spowoduje automatyczne zebranie danych osobowych. Obszar monitoringu jest oznaczony odpowiednimi piktogramami.
9. DANE OSOBOWE PRZETWARZANE W ZWIĄZKU Z PROCESEM REKLAMACYJNYM W SKLEPACH STACJONARNYCH
Dane osobowe przetwarzane w związku z reklamacjami składanymi przez Ciebie w sklepach stacjonarnych, tj. imię, nazwisko, adres do korespondencji, adres poczty elektronicznej, numer telefonu, numer rachunku bankowego, historia komunikacji mailowej i SMS pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk, informacje o reklamowanym produkcie, przyczynie reklamacji i Twoich żądaniach przetwarzane są:
w celu rozpatrywania składanych przez Ciebie reklamacji – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako na sprzedającym podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO w związku z przepisami kodeksu cywilnego o rękojmi;
w celu wywiązania się z obowiązków nałożonych na nas przepisami prawa, w tym przez ustawę o rachunkowości lub przepisy podatkowe (w zakresie dotyczącym wystawiania i przechowywania faktur oraz dokumentów księgowych) – jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne do
wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako na sprzedającym podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO;
w celu ustalenia oraz dochodzenia roszczeń lub obrony przed roszczeniami, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO, przy czym wyjaśniamy, że prawnie uzasadniony interes Smyk polega na zapewnieniu możliwości ochrony praw i interesów Smyk przy wykorzystaniu przewidzianych prawem środków;
w celu wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązku stosowania tzw. zasady rozliczalności, czyli obowiązku wykazania przez Smyk przestrzegania przepisów dotyczących ochrony danych osobowych – jako że przetwarzanie jest niezbędne do wykonania obowiązków prawnych ciążących na Smyk jako administratorze danych podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c) RODO.
III. MARKETING BEZPOŚREDNI, PROFILOWANIE I ZAUTOMATYZOWANE PODEJMOWANIE
DECYZJI
Będziemy gromadzić i automatycznie przetwarzać następujący zakres Twoich danych osobowych:
dane osobowe podane przez Ciebie w związku z zakładaniem konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com lub rejestracją jako odbiorca informacji handlowych,
dane osobowe podane przez Ciebie dodatkowo po zarejestrowaniu konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com,
informacje związane z Twoją aktywnością w ramach zarejestrowanego konta (historia Twoich zakupów, informacje o przyznanych i wykorzystanych przez Ciebie punktach i rabatach),
Twoje opinie lub sugestie, a także
historię komunikacji mailowej i SMS pomiędzy Tobą a Smyk (wraz ze statusami doręczenia oraz informacją o kliknięciu w dostarczone linki).
Powyższe informacje, które posiadamy o Tobie, będziemy wykorzystywać w celu: (i) określenia jakiego rodzaju oferty lub komunikaty mogą być atrakcyjne dla Ciebie oraz dla innych naszych klientów jak również (ii) w celu informowania Cię o produktach, nowościach i promocjach w naszej ofercie oraz (iii) w celu przesyłania Ci ankiet satysfakcji bezpośrednio po dokonanym zakupie. Podstawą prawną przetwarzania danych dla wymienionych celów jest nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes polegający na możliwości podejmowania działań w zakresie marketingu bezpośredniego produktów oferowanych przez Smyk (art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f) RODO).
Jeżeli wyrazisz zgodę, na podstawie ww. informacji o Tobie, będziemy tworzyli Twój profil klienta, za pośrednictwem którego poznamy Twoje osobiste preferencje i zachowania w celu przedstawiania Ci indywidulanie dobranych informacji o produktach, nowościach i promocjach, które naszym zdaniem mogą Cię zainteresować. Ponadto aby w optymalny sposób dostosować naszą ofertę do Twoich potrzeb oraz zainteresowań, będziemy w sposób zautomatyzowany podejmować decyzje o doborze: wyświetlanych Ci reklam, prezentowanych (podpowiadanych) produktów w trakcie składania zamówienia, przesyłanych Ci informacji o produktach i usługach oraz promocjach i zniżkach, oferowanych przez Smyk.
Decyzje te będą oparte wyłącznie na zautomatyzowanym przetwarzaniu danych, w tym profilowaniu, obejmującym: Twoje dane związane z zakupami w sklepach stacjonarnych Smyk, w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, dane podane w formularzach rejestracyjnych, aktualizacyjnych lub aktywizacyjnych, informacje o aktywności, w tym informacje o nabytych przez Ciebie produktach, informacje o lokalizacji i historię przeglądania, a także modele statystyczne. W tym przypadku podstawą prawną przetwarzania Twoich danych jest udzielona przez Ciebie zgoda (art. 6 ust. 1 lit. a) RODO).
W wyniku tych decyzji będziemy automatycznie przygotowywać dedykowaną dla Ciebie informację o produktach i usługach oraz promocjach i zniżkach, oferowanych przez Smyk, a także - o ile wyrazisz odpowiednie zgody na wybraną przez Ciebie formę komunikacji - informować Cię o niej emailem, powiadomieniem push (w aplikacji mobilnej) lub SMS-em.
IV. ODBIORCY DANYCH OSOBOWYCH
W zakresie w jakim jest to uzasadnione celem przetwarzania będziemy przekazywać dane osobowe podmiotom, które działają na nasze zlecenie, tj. dostawcom usług i rozwiązań informatycznych, agencjom marketingowym, podmiotom świadczącym usługi księgowe, prawne, finansowe, ubezpieczeniowe i administracyjne, audytorom, podmiotom przeprowadzającym na nasze zlecenie badanie satysfakcji klienta, podmiotom prowadzącym na nasze zlecenie Centrum Obsługi Klienta, podmiotom świadczącym na naszą rzecz usługi związane z obsługą magazynu, podmiotom zajmującym się usługami w zakresie masowej wysyłki wiadomości, doradcom, firmom ochroniarskim oraz podmiotom dostarczającym narzędzia, o których mowa w punkcie XI niniejszej polityki. Każdorazowo przekazanie danych, o których mowa w niniejszym akapicie odbywać się będzie na podstawie odpowiedniej umowy powierzenia danych osobowych.
Jeżeli będzie to wymagane przez przepisy lub niezbędne w celu dochodzenia lub obrony przed roszczeniami będziemy także przekazywać dane osobowe organom publicznym, w tym sądom, prokuraturze lub policji oraz profesjonalnym pełnomocnikom (podmioty te staną się w takiej sytuacji odrębnymi administratorami danych).
Jeżeli zdecydujesz się na dokonanie płatności za pośrednictwem jednego ze współpracujących z nami podmiotów obsługujących płatności elektroniczne udostępnimy Twoje dane obejmujące imię, nazwisko, numer zamówienia, wartość zamówionego towaru, numer IP, adres email, numer telefonu, Twój identyfikator klienta przypisany Ci przez podmiot obsługujący płatności temu podmiotowi w celu realizacji Twojej płatności. Podmiot ten stanie się odrębnym administratorem Twoich danych.
Jeżeli zdecydujesz się na dokonanie płatności z wykorzystaniem finansowania lub kredytu konsumenckiego za pośrednictwem jednego ze współpracujących z nami podmiotów mających status
instytucji pożyczkowej w rozumieniu art. 5 pkt 2a ustawy z dnia 12 maja 2011 r. o kredycie konsumenckim, udostępnimy Twoje dane obejmujące imię, nazwisko, numer zamówienia, wartość zamówionego towaru, (w szczególności cenę nabycia towaru, wraz z informacją o kosztach brutto jego dostarczenia), adres email, numer telefonu, adres dostawy. Podmiot ten stanie się odrębnym administratorem Twoich danych.
Jeżeli uruchomisz procedurę obciążenia zwrotnego (chargeback) udostępnimy Twoje dane obejmujące imię, nazwisko, numer i wartość zamówienia, adres email, adres do wysyłki towaru, sposób dostawy towaru, numer telefonu, Twój identyfikator klienta przypisany Ci przez podmiot obsługujący płatności, potwierdzenie odbioru zamówienia lub realizacji sprzedaży (w tym zawierające Twój podpis) oraz treść ewentualnej korespondencji dotyczącej reklamacji związanej z procedurą obciążenia zwrotnego dostawcy usług płatniczych w celu obsługi procesu obciążenia zwrotnego. Dostawca usług płatniczych stanie się odrębnym administratorem Twoich danych. Jeżeli zdecydujesz się na zamówienie produktów ze sklepu internetowego smyk.com z dostawą pod wskazany adres lub do paczkomatu, bądź w sytuacji, gdy Smyk będzie wysyłał do Ciebie tradycyjną przesyłkę (np. list z odpowiedzią na Twoje zgłoszenie), Twoje dane, w zakresie niezbędnym do doręczenia przesyłki, zostaną przekazane Poczcie Polskiej, firmie kurierskiej lub firmie obsługującej Paczkomaty, które to podmioty staną się odrębnymi administratorami tychże danych.
V. PRZEKAZYWANIE DANYCH OSOBOWYCH POZA EOG
Korzystamy z usług:
analityki internetowej umożliwiającej nam badanie i analizowanie sposobu korzystania ze strony internetowej smyk.com oraz aplikacji mobilnej przez jej użytkowników oraz ich opinii lub potrzeb. W związku z tym numery IP użytkowników, informacje o urządzeniach, z których korzystają (takie jak dane o systemie operacyjnym, ale też: dane geolokalizacyjne, dostawcy internetu, dane o przeglądarce, ustawienia urządzenia (rozdzielczość i kolorystyka ekranu, obsługa flash i java) oraz adres e-mail (przy czym zaznaczamy, że adres e-mail jest zaszyfrowany i przekazywany wyłącznie w celu personalizacji reklam skierowanych do użytkowników, którzy wyrazili zgodę na otrzymywanie informacji handlowych za pośrednictwem środków komunikacji elektronicznej) mogą być przetwarzane na serwerach znajdujących się poza Europejskim Obszarem Gospodarczym, w tym w USA;
narzędzi wspomagających proces obsługi klienta. W związku z tym dane dotyczące komunikacji w sprawie, z którą się do nas zwracasz mogą być przetwarzane na serwerach znajdujących się poza Europejskim Obszarem Gospodarczym, w tym w USA.
Przepisy dotyczące ochrony danych osobowych poza Europejskim Obszarem Gospodarczym mogą nie zapewniać ochrony danych osobowych porównywalnej do ochrony gwarantowanej RODO. W związku z tym przekazanie danych osobowych poza Europejski Obszar Gospodarczy będzie odbywać się tylko w takim w zakresie, jaki jest niezbędny i tylko po wdrożeniu środków gwarantujących odpowiedną ochronę tych danych.
Transfer może odbywać się do państw, w stosunku do których wydana została stosowna decyzja Komisji Europejskiej stwierdzająca odpowiedni stopień ochrony danych osobowych lub z wykorzystaniem odpowiednich zabezpieczeń, w tym:
standardowych klauzul umownych przyjętych przez Komisję Europejską, lub
wiążących reguł korporacyjnych zatwierdzonych przez organ nadzorczy.
Przypominamy, iż zgodnie z zasadami dotyczącymi prywatności określonymi przez serwisy społecznościowe takie jak Facebook, Instagram i YouTube dane osobowe użytkowników tych serwisów mogą być przez nie przetwarzane poza Europejskim Obszarem Gospodarczym, w tym w USA.
W pozostałym zakresie nie będziemy przekazywać Twoich danych osobowych do państw trzecich (tj. poza Europejski Obszar Gospodarczy) ani do organizacji międzynarodowych.
VI. OKRES PRZETWARZANIA TWOICH DANYCH OSOBOWYCH
Twoje dane osobowe będziemy przetwarzać przez następujący czas:
w zakresie, w jakim Twoje dane osobowe są przez nas przetwarzane dla realizacji umowy -  będziemy je przetwarzać przez okres obowiązywania tejże umowy;
w zakresie, w jakim dane osobowe są przetwarzane dla realizacji naszych prawnie uzasadnionych interesów - będziemy je przetwarzać przez okres istnienia prawnie uzasadnionego interesu, chyba że wcześniej zgłosisz sprzeciw wobec przetwarzania tych danych. Jeżeli będziemy mogli wykazać istnienie ważnych, prawnie uzasadnionych podstaw do dalszego przetwarzania tych danych, nadrzędnych wobec Twoich praw, lub koniecznych do ustalenia, dochodzenia lub obrony roszczeń, obrony stanowiska Smyk w postępowaniach karnych, administracyjnych lub w sprawach o wykroczenie, a także przeciwdziałania ewentualnym nadużyciom lub oszustwom, będziemy je przetwarzać pomimo Twojego sprzeciwu (nie dotyczy to Twojego sprzeciwu dotyczącego przetwarzania w celach marketingu bezpośredniego, który nie wymaga
uzasadnienia);
w zakresie, w jakim dane osobowe są przetwarzane w oparciu o zgodę podmiotu danych lub (w przypadku danych dzieci) w oparciu o zgodę przedstawiciela ustawowego podmiotu danych - będą one przetwarzane do czasu wycofania zgody, przy czym w przypadku danych dzieci nie dłużej niż do osiągnięcia przez dziecko wieku 13 lat;
w zakresie, w jakim dane osobowe są przetwarzane dla celów wywiązania się przez nas z obowiązków wynikających z przepisów prawa (np. z ustawy o rachunkowości, przepisów podatkowych lub RODO) - będziemy je przetwarzać przez okres wynikający z takich przepisów (np. w celach rozliczeniowych Twoje dane będą przechowywane przez 5 lat licząc od końca roku kalendarzowego, w którym upłynął termin płatności podatku związanego z zamówieniem lub transakcją);
w zakresie, w jakim dane osobowe są przetwarzane dla celów ustalenia lub dochodzenia roszczeń, a także w celu obrony przed takimi roszczeniami - będziemy je przetwarzać przez okres przedawnienia Twoich lub naszych roszczeń.
VII. TWOJE PRAWA W ZWIĄZKU Z PRZETWARZANIEM DANYCH OSOBOWYCH
W związku z przetwarzaniem przez Smyk Twoich danych osobowych przysługują Ci następujące prawa:
Prawo do informacji, dostępu i kopii danych:
Prawo do uzyskania potwierdzenia czy przetwarzamy Twoje dane osobowe, prawo uzyskania dostępu do tych danych, prawo do uzyskania informacji o przetwarzaniu danych osobowych, w tym przede wszystkim informacji o celach przetwarzania danych osobowych, kategoriach danych, podmiotach, którym dane są ujawniane, okresie przechowywania danych, informacji przysługujących Ci prawach związanych z przetwarzaniem przez nas Twoich danych oraz o skardze do organu nadzorczego, o źródłach danych (gdy dane nie są zbierane bezpośrednio od Ciebie), informacji o zautomatyzowanym podejmowaniu decyzji (w tym profilowaniu) i ich konsekwencjach, a także prawo do uzyskania kopii Twoich danych osobowych.
Prawo do sprostowania lub uzupełnienia:
Prawo do żądania sprostowania (poprawienia) nieprawidłowych lub uzupełnienia niekompletnych danych osobowych;
Prawo do ograniczenia przetwarzania:
Prawo do żądania ograniczenia przetwarzania Twoich danych osobowych w przypadkach wskazanych w art. 18 RODO, gdy kwestionujesz prawidłowość przetwarzanych przez nas Twoich danych osobowych, przetwarzanie Twoich danych osobowych jest niezgodne z prawem, ale sprzeciwiasz się usunięciu tych danych żądając w zamian ograniczenia ich wykorzystywania, nie potrzebujemy już Twoich danych osobowych dla realizacji naszych celów, ale są one potrzebne Tobie do ustalenia, dochodzenia lub obrony roszczeń bądź gdy wniosłaś/eś sprzeciw wobec przetwarzania przez nas Twoich danych osobowych ze względu na Twoją szczególną sytuację; \ W przypadku ograniczenia przetwarzania
Twoich danych osobowych będziemy je mogli przechowywać, a także wykorzystywać jedynie w celu ustalenia, dochodzenia lub obrony roszczeń, w celu ochrony praw innej osoby fizycznej lub prawnej, lub z uwagi na ważne względy interesu publicznego Unii lub państwa członkowskiego, zaś inne czynności będziemy mogli podejmować tylko za Twoją zgodą;
Prawo do usunięcia:
Prawo do żądania usunięcia Twoich danych osobowych: Masz prawo żądania usunięcia przez Smyk Twoich danych. Smyk musi zastosować się do Twojego żądania jeśli Twoje dane osobowe nie są już niezbędne dla realizacji celów, dla których zostały zebrane i przetwarzane, jeśli cofniesz swoją zgodę na ich przetwarzanie, a nie ma innej podstawy do przetwarzania przez nas tych danych, jeśli zgłosisz sprzeciw wobec przetwarzania przez nas Twoich danych osobowych ze względu na Twoją szczególną sytuację, a my nie mamy podstaw przetwarzania, które byłyby nadrzędne wobec podstaw Twojego sprzeciwu, zgłosisz sprzeciw wobec ich przetwarzania przez nas dla celów marketingowych, przetwarzaliśmy Twoje dane osobowe niezgodnie z prawem, usunięcie Twoich danych jest konieczne w celu wywiązania się z obowiązku prawnego przewidzianego w prawie Unii lub prawie polskim, dane osobowe zostały zebrane w związku z oferowaniem usług społeczeństwa informacyjnego;.
Prawo do przenoszenia danych:
W sytuacji, gdy Twoje dane są przetwarzane w sposób zautomatyzowany na podstawie zgody lub umowy masz prawo by otrzymać od nas Twoje dane, które nam dostarczyłaś/eś na podstawie zgody lub umowy, w ustrukturyzowanym, powszechnie dostępnym formacie nadającym się do odczytu maszynowego (np. do odczytu na komputerze), a także możesz nas poprosić o przesłanie Twoich danych innemu administratorowi, pod warunkiem, że będzie to technicznie możliwe po stronie Smyk, jak i innego administratora;
Sprzeciw wobec marketingu bezpośredniego:
Masz prawo do wniesienia w dowolnym momencie sprzeciwu wobec przetwarzania przez nas Twoich danych osobowych dla potrzeb marketingu bezpośredniego, bez konieczności jego uzasadniania;
Sprzeciw ze względu na Twoją szczególną sytuację:
W zakresie, w jakim podstawą przetwarzania przez nas Twoich danych jest nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes, masz prawo do wniesienia w dowolnym momencie sprzeciwu wobec przetwarzania tych danych z przyczyn związanych z Twoją szczególną sytuacją, wskazując jednocześnie w uzasadnieniu tę szczególną sytuację, która Twoim zdaniem uzasadnia zaprzestanie przetwarzania przez nas Twoich danych objętych sprzeciwem;
Cofnięcie zgody na przetwarzanie danych:
W zakresie w jakim Twoje dane będą przetwarzane na podstawie Twojej zgody masz prawo do jej cofnięcia w dowolnym momencie, przy czym cofnięcie zgody nie wpływa na czynności przetwarzania dokonane przez nas na podstawie zgody przed jej cofnięciem;
Cofnięcie zgody na otrzymywanie komunikacji handlowej:
W każdej chwili możesz cofnąć zgodę na otrzymywanie komunikacji handlowej wyrażoną zgodnie z ustawą z dnia 12 lipca 2024 r. Prawo komunikacji elektronicznej;
Prawo do interwencji ludzkiej:
Jeżeli – w oparciu o udzieloną przez Ciebie zgodę – podlegasz decyzjom opartym wyłącznie na zautomatyzowanym przetwarzaniu Twoich danych, w tym profilowaniu, wywołującym wobec Ciebie skutki prawne lub w podobny sposób istotnie na Ciebie wpływającym, masz prawo w każdym czasie wyrazić swoje stanowisko w tej sprawie, zakwestionować decyzję podjętą w ten sposób i zażądać interwencji ludzkiej, tj. włączenia osoby odpowiedzialnej z ramienia Smyk w podejmowanie ww. decyzji, np. co do kierowanych do Ciebie treści marketingowych, ofert, etc.
Aby skorzystać z przysługujących Ci praw skontaktuj się z nami na podane powyżej w punkcie I niniejszego regulaminu dane kontaktowe („Dane administratora oraz inspektora ochrony danych”). Dane osobowe podane przez Ciebie w trakcie rejestracji konta klienta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com i przechowywane w koncie klienta możesz także samodzielnie edytować w ustawieniach Twojego konta. W ten sam sposób możesz zarządzać udzielonymi zgodami oraz usunąć całe swoje konto klienta. Możesz również zwrócić się do nas z żądaniem usunięcia całego konta klienta poprzez wysłanie stosownej prośby na adres email: mojedane@smyk.com z adresu poczty elektronicznej aktualnie zarejestrowanego w sklepie internetowym smyk.com. Informacje o sposobie rezygnacji z otrzymywania informacji handlowych wskazane są również w stopce każdej informacji handlowej w postaci wiadomości e-mail.
Skarga do organu nadzorczego:
Masz także prawo wnieść skargę do organu zajmującego się ochroną danych osobowych właściwego ze względu na Twoje miejsce zwykłego pobytu, miejsce pracy lub miejsce popełnienia domniemanego naruszenia (w Polsce tym organem jest Prezes Urzędu Ochrony Danych Osobowych) jeżeli uznasz, że przetwarzanie przez nas Twoich danych osobowych narusza postanowienia przepisów o ochronie danych osobowych, w tym RODO.
VIII. KONSEKWENCJE NIEPODANIA DANYCH OSOBOWYCH
Podanie danych osobowych jest dobrowolne, jednakże niepodanie niektórych danych osobowych (tożsamości lub danych adresowych) może uniemożliwić nam świadczenie Tobie usług, dokonywanie przez Ciebie zakupów w sklepie internetowym smyk.com, udzielenie odpowiedzi na korespondencję oraz obsługę spraw, z którymi się do nas zwracasz, lub wykonanie ciążącego na nas obowiązku prawnego.
Z tego powodu podanie podstawowych danych (tożsamość użytkownika, adres e-mail, numer telefonu, a w przypadku składania zamówienia w sklepie internetowym smyk.com – również adresy pocztowe) jest konieczne dla dokonania zakupu w sklepie internetowym.
Niepodanie wymaganych danych w celu otrzymywania informacji handlowych uniemożliwi ich przesyłanie. Niepodanie danych wymaganych na etapie rejestracji konta użytkownika sklepu internetowego smyk.com uniemożliwi rejestrację konta użytkownika.
Każdorazowo dane niezbędne do realizacji umowy, odpowiedzi na zgłoszenie lub wykonania przez nas obowiązku prawnego są oznaczone jako „obowiązkowe”, zaś ich niepodanie uniemożliwi realizację umowy, udzielenie odpowiedzi lub wykonanie obowiązku prawnego. Podanie danych nieoznaczonych jako „obowiązkowe” jest dobrowolne, a ich niepodanie nie wiąże się z żadnymi negatywnymi konsekwencjami.
IX. APLIKACJA MOBILNA
Smyk udostępnia niektóre ze swoich usług za pośrednictwem aplikacji mobilnej Smyk. Z korzystaniem z aplikacji mobilnej Smyk jedynie w celu uzyskania informacji (tzn. w zakresie innym niż wskazane w punktach a-b poniżej) wiąże się przetwarzanie przez Smyk pewnych informacji takich jak: informacje o urządzeniu, adres IP oraz inne dane o sesji (takie jak: szybkość ładowania, wyświetlenia poszczególnych ekranów, preferencje dotyczące otrzymywania powiadomień od aplikacji). Z wyrażeniem zgody na powiadomienia push wiąże się przetwarzanie przez Smyk numeru identyfikacyjnego urządzenia. Jako że przetwarzanie danych jest niezbędne dla realizacji umowy o świadczenie usług drogą elektroniczną oraz niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk podstawą przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust. 1 lit b) RODO oraz art. 6 ust 1 lit. f) RODO), przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności. Jeżeli jednak za pośrednictwem aplikacji:
tworzysz lub korzystasz z konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com – zastosowanie znajdą zasady przetwarzania danych osobowych osób, które zarejestrowały konto w sklepie internetowym smyk.com określone w części II punkt 3 (
„Dane osób, które rejestrują się (zakładają konto) w sklepie internetowym smyk.com”
) niniejszego dokumentu;
zamawiasz produkty w sklepie internetowym smyk.com – zastosowanie znajdą zasady przetwarzania danych osobowych osób składających zamówienie w sklepie internetowym smyk.com określone w części II punkt 2A (
„Dane osób przetwarzane w związku z zamówieniem w sklepie internetowym smyk.com (bez rejestracji lub korzystania z konta w sklepie internetowym smyk.com)”
) niniejszego dokumentu.
X. ZASADY BEZPIECZEŃSTWA
Dla Twojego bezpieczeństwa, pamiętaj o:
ustanowieniu loginu i hasła do Twojego konta Klienta uniemożliwiających w prosty sposób odgadnięcie ich przez osoby trzecie. W szczególności zalecamy stosowanie w haśle ciągu znaków i cyfr, dużych i małych liter oraz znaków specjalnych;
wylogowaniu się ze strony smyk.com po zakończonej sesji (zakończonych zakupach, dodawaniu recenzji o produktach itp.). Samo wyłączenie okna przeglądarki nie jest równoznaczne z wylogowaniem się ze strony smyk.com. Wylogowanie ze strony smyk.com nastąpi po kliknięciu przycisku „Wyloguj”:;
zachowaniu loginu i hasła do konta Klienta w tajemnicy, w tym w szczególności o nieprzekazywaniu danych (loginu, hasła) jakimkolwiek osobom trzecim;
korzystaniu z aktualnych programów antywirusowych, w tym regularnym skanowaniu dysków w poszukiwaniu wirusów i programów szpiegujących;
korzystaniu wyłącznie z aktualnych wersji przeglądarek internetowych oraz aktualizacji systemu operacyjnego Twojego komputera lub urządzenia mobilnego;
korzystaniu ze strony i sklepu internetowego smyk.com wyłącznie za pośrednictwem zaufanych urządzeń końcowych (takich jak w szczególności komputery i tablety), na których zainstalowano wyłącznie sprawdzone oprogramowanie, a także z zaufanych sieci teleinformatycznych. Korzystanie z cudzych urządzeń końcowych a także niezaufanych sieci teleinformatycznych rodzi ryzyko przechwycenia przez osoby trzecie loginu, hasła lub innych danych, które podajesz;
jeśli jednak korzystasz ze strony lub sklepu internetowego smyk.com za pomocą obcego urządzenia, np. w kafejce internetowej, pamiętaj o tym, aby nie zapamiętywać danych na komputerze i usunąć historię przeglądanych stron co jest szczególnie zalecane. Z zapamiętanych danych może skorzystać osoba która będzie korzystała z urządzenia po Tobie;
niezwłocznej zmianie hasła, gdy podejrzewasz, że mogło utracić poufność;
zgłaszaniu zauważonych problemów lub niestandardowych sytuacji mogących zagrażać bezpieczeństwu informacji przy korzystaniu ze strony smyk.com lub aplikacji mobilnej na adres
mojedane@smyk.com
.
XI. COOKIES I INNE NARZĘDZIA
1. COOKIES
Strona internetowa smyk.com korzysta z tzw. plików
cookies
pozwalających gromadzić informacje związane z Tobą i Twoim urządzeniem.
Cookies
to niewielkie pliki (w szczególności tekstowe), które odwiedzana przez Ciebie strona internetowa zapisuje na Twoim urządzeniu końcowym (komputerze, smartfonie, tablecie itp.), z którego łączysz się ze stroną. Informacje zawarte w plikach typu
cookies
składają się z szeregu liter i cyfr.
Pliki
cookies
mogą przechowywać dane osobowe.
Zasadniczo pliki cookies dzielą się na:
stałe – pozostają w przeglądarce internetowej urządzenia końcowego do momentu usunięcia ich przez Ciebie bądź do z góry określonego przez nas czasu;
sesyjne (tymczasowe) – pozostają w przeglądarce internetowej urządzenia do momentu jej wyłączenia, bądź wyjścia ze strony internetowej, na której zostały zamieszczone;
podmiotów zewnętrznych (tzw. third party
cookies
) – to informacje pochodzące np. z serwerów reklamowych, serwerów firm i dostawców usług (np. wewnętrznej wyszukiwarki albo map umieszczanych na stronie) współpracujących z właścicielem serwisu internetowego. Ten rodzaj
cookies
pozwala dostosowywać do preferencji i zwyczajów ich użytkowników. Pozwalają również ocenić skuteczność działań reklamowych (np. dzięki zliczaniu, ile osób kliknęło w daną reklamę i przeszło na stronę internetową reklamodawcy).
Niektóre z tych plików są konieczne prawidłowego funkcjonowania strony internetowej smyk.com. Te
konieczne pliki
cookies
można wyłączyć zmieniając ustawienia przeglądarki, przy czym może to spowodować nieprawidłowe funkcjonowanie strony internetowej smyk.com.
Ponadto, wyłącznie w przypadku uzyskania Twojej zgody, wykorzystujemy dodatkowe pliki
cookies
oraz konwersje rozszerzone (o których mowa w punkcie 4 poniżej) w celu uzyskiwania dostępu, analizowania i przechowywania dodatkowych informacji a także niektórych danych osobowych. Możemy również udostępniać te informacje, w tym Twoje dane osobowe, stronom trzecim, będącym naszymi partnerami marketingowymi, które mogą je łączyć z innymi informacjami, które im przekazujesz lub które zbierają za pośrednictwem swoich usług, w celu dostarczania Ci spersonalizowanych reklam (Lista partnerów marketingowych
https://www.smyk.com/polityk
a
-
prywatnosci/cookies
). W przypadku braku Twojej zgody, użyjemy tylko niezbędnych cookies i nie będziesz otrzymywać żadnych spersonalizowanych treści oraz reklam dostosowanych do Twoich indywidualnych zainteresowań.
Przetwarzanie danych w ramach plików
cookies
i konwersji rozszerzonych (o których mowa w punkcie 4 poniżej) służy różnym celom. Poniżej wskazujemy, z jakich kategorii plików
cookies
i konwersji rozszerzonych (o których mowa w punkcie 4 poniżej) korzystamy oraz wyjaśniamy cele przetwarzania danych:
Pliki konieczne, tj. niezbędne do prawidłowego działania strony internetowej smyk.com
– pliki te umożliwiają prawidłowe działanie strony internetowej smyk.com, logowanie do sklepu internetowego smyk.com, nawigowanie po stronie internetowej smyk.com, dokonywanie zakupów oraz zapewniające bezpieczeństwo sesji. Bez ich zapisania na Twoim urządzeniu korzystanie ze wszystkich funkcjonalności strony internetowej smyk.com jest niemożliwe.
Pliki statystyczne/wydajnościowe
– akceptując te pliki wyrażasz zgodę na zbieranie przez nas anonimowych informacji statystycznych na temat sposobu korzystania przez Ciebie ze strony internetowej smyk.com w celu oceny skuteczności naszych kampanii, ulepszania naszej oferty i naszej witryny, w tym na określenie liczby unikalnych odwiedzin naszej witryny i optymalizację jej zawartości..
Pliki
zwiększające
komfort korzystania/funkcjonalne
– akceptując te pliki wyrażasz zgodę na zbieranie przez nas informacji pozwalających na zwiększenie komfortu korzystania z naszej witryny, np. poprzez zapamiętanie Twoich ustawień i preferencji. Dzięki zapisaniu tych plików na Twoim urządzeniu m.in. nie musisz każdorazowo wpisywać loginu i hasła, czy dodawać ponownie produktów do koszyka oraz uzyskujesz dostęp do spersonalizowanej oferty naszej witryny, opartej na wynikach Twojego dotychczasowego wyszukiwania..
Pliki reklamowe
oraz konwersje rozszerzone
- akceptując te pliki oraz konwersje rozszerzone
(o których mowa w punkcie 4 poniżej) wyrażasz zgodę na gromadzenie o Tobie informacji (w tym danych osobowych), Twoim zachowaniu i urządzeniach, z których korzystasz, aby tworzyć Twój profil zainteresowań i dostarczać Ci na stronie smyk.com oraz w witrynach zewnętrznych (w tym w mediach społecznościowych) reklam dostosowanych do Twoich indywidualnych zainteresowań. Zebrane informacje mogą być wykorzystywane przez naszą witrynę lub przez współpracujące z nami podmioty świadczące usługi reklamowe. W celu dostarczenia Ci spersonalizowanej oferty reklamowej w witrynach zewnętrznych, udostępnimy informacje, takie jak: zaszyfrowany adres e-mail, informacje o urządzeniach, z których korzystasz, oraz Twój identyfikator klienta, naszym partnerom marketingowym np. serwisom Facebook lub Google..
Korzystamy przy tym z naszych własnych plików
cookies
i plików
cookies
innych firm, które mogą je łączyć z innymi informacjami, które im przekazujesz lub które zbierają za pośrednictwem swoich usług. Pliki
cookies
nie są w żaden sposób szkodliwe dla Twojego urządzenia i nie zmieniają jego ustawień ani ustawień zainstalowanego na nim oprogramowania. Odczytanie zawartości tych plików możliwe jest jedynie przez dostawcę usług internetowych, który je utworzył. Pod poniższym linkiem znajdziesz listę plików
cookies
, z których korzystamy:
https://www.smyk.com/polityk
a
-
prywatnosci/cookies
Możesz wyrazić zgodę na umieszczanie przez nas wszystkich plików
cookies
, oraz konwersji rozszerzonych (o których mowa w punkcie 4 poniżej) klikając przycisk „Akceptuję wszystkie” albo dokonać wyboru plików
cookies
lub konwersji rozszerzonych (o których mowa w punkcie 4 poniżej) klikając przycisk „Zarządzaj zgodami” w oknie ustawień preferencji plików
cookies
i konwersji rozszerzonych pojawiającym się przy wejściu na stronę
internetową
www.smyk.co
m
.
Wyrażenie zgody jest dobrowolne. Możesz w każdej chwili zablokować instalowanie plików
cookies
lub konwersji rozszerzonych (o których mowa w punkcie 4 poniżej) na Twoim urządzeniu lub śledzenie przez takie pliki Twojej aktywności na stronie internetowej smyk.com w następujący sposób:
zgodnie z wyborem dokonanym w oknie ustawień preferencji plików cookies i konwersji rozszerzonych pojawiającym się przy wejściu na stronę i
nternetową
smyk.com
lub
poprzez wybór pola „ustawienia prywatności” w sekcji „Moje konto” na dole strony internetowej
smyk.com
(z wyjątkiem plików koniecznych) lub
poprzez zmianę ustawienia Twojej przeglądarki internetowej.
Możesz z łatwością usuwać pliki
cookies
, które zostały już zapisane na urządzeniu przez przeglądarkę. W takim przypadku informacje w nich zawarte zostaną usunięte z Twojego urządzenia końcowego. Możesz tego dokonać w następujący sposób:
poprzez wybór pola „ustawienia prywatności” w sekcji „Moje konto” na dole strony internetowej
smyk.com
lub
poprzez swoją przeglądarkę.
Większość przeglądarek oferuje możliwość akceptowania lub odrzucania wszystkich plików
cookies
, akceptowania tylko niektórych rodzajów albo informowania użytkownika za każdym razem, gdy strona internetowa próbuje je zapisać. Zarządzanie i usuwanie plików
cookies
różni się w zależności od używanej przeglądarki. Dokładne informacje na ten temat można uzyskać, korzystając z funkcji Pomoc w przeglądarce.
Poniżej wskazujemy linki do ustawień
cookies
najpopularniejszych przeglądarek:
Google Chrome -
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647
Firefox -
https://support.mozilla.org/pl/kb/wylaczani
e
-
ciastecze
k
-
pochodzacyc
h
-
z
-
innyc
h
-
witryn
Safari -
https://support.apple.com/p
l
-
pl/guide/safari/sfri11471/mac
Opera -
https://help.opera.com/pl/latest/we
b
-
preferences/#cookies
2. REMARKETING GOOGLE INC.
Smyk używa na stronie smyk.com funkcji remarketingu dostarczanej przez Google Inc („Google”). Ta funkcja jest realizowana za pomocą plików cookies i jest wykorzystywana do wyświetlania reklam opartych na zainteresowaniach użytkownika na stronach należących do Google Advertising Network. Na tych stronach użytkownikowi może zostać wyświetlona reklama na podstawie wcześniejszej aktywności użytkownika na stronie smyk.com. Google informuje o niezbieraniu danych osobowych podczas tego procesu. Jeżeli nie chcesz aby reklamy Ci wyświetlane wykorzystywały remarketing Google, możesz dokonać odpowiednich ustawień pod adresem:
http://www.google.com/settings/ad
s
.
Więcej informacji na temat remarketingu Google i polityki prywatności Google pod adresem:
http://www.google.com/privacy/ads
/
.
3. REKLAMY ONLINE W OPARCIU O AKTYWNOŚĆ
Wykorzystujemy Twoje wizyty na smyk.com i innych stronach internetowych, a także Twoje zwyczaje w przeglądaniu Internetu, w celu próby określenia Twoich zainteresowań, tak abyśmy mogli wyświetlić Ci reklamę odpowiadającą Twoim preferencjom. Korzystamy przy tym z plików
cookies
i konwersji rozszerzonych dostarczanych przez strony trzecie i tworzymy ogólne „profile użytkowników”. Możemy analizować informacje z tych plików i konwersji rozszerzonych w celach reklamowych. Nie jest możliwe powiązanie przez nas informacji z tych plików i konwersji rozszerzonych z konkretnymi osobami fizycznymi. Używamy tego typu plików w szczególności w celu:
Przechowywania Twoich wizyt na stronie smyk.com w celu określenia Twoich zainteresowań;
Weryfikowania Twoich kliknięć w reklamy;
Określania liczby użytkowników klikających w reklamy;
Korzystania z rozwiązań stron trzecich w celu wyświetlania Ci reklam dostosowanych do Twoich preferencji;
Wyłonienia skutecznej formy reklamy;
Wyświetlania Ci reklam produktów, którymi byłeś wcześniej zainteresowany;
Monitorowania liczby wyświetlonych reklam w celu ich zróżnicowania;
Analizowania, które reklamy kliknąłeś zanim kupiłeś produkt;
Określania liczby zamówień powiązanych z daną reklamą, a co za tym idzie wartości danej reklamy.
Korzystamy przy tym z różnych narzędzi remarketingu i śledzenia dostarczanych przez strony trzecie pozwalających nam na wyłonienie użytkowników na stronach partnerów reklamowych w celu wyświetlenia spersonalizowanej oferty. Następujące podmioty są odpowiedzialne za gromadzenie danych koniecznych do świadczenia usług reklamy online w oparciu o aktywność: Google (Adwords (remarketing), DoubleClick (Floodlight)), Facebook.
Narzędzie służące do śledzenia i remarketingu dzielą się na różne kategorie:
Google Adwords remarketing – kategoria personalizacji
Google Adwords (konerwsje rozszerzone) - kategoria statystyki
DoubleClick Floodlight (conversion) – kategoria statystyki
DoubleClick Floodlight (remarketing) – kategoria personalizacji
DoubleClick Search – kategoria statystyki
Facebook Pixel – kategoria analityki i personalizacji
Facebook Custom Audiences – kategoria personalizacji
Google Customer Match – kategoria personalizacji
Traffic store – kategoria personalizacji i geotargetowania
Facebook Events Manager – kategoria personalizacji
7 Day Click (Facebook/remarketing) – kategoria personalizacji
Szczegółowe informacje odnośnie konwersji rozszerzonych dostępne są pod następującym linkiem
https://support.google.com/googl
e
-
ads/answer/9888656?hl=pl
a szczegółowe informacje i wyjaśnienia odnośnie innych produktów Google dostępne są pod następującym
linkiem:
https://support.google.com/searchads/answer/7298761?hl=pl&authuser=0
Szczegółowe informacje i wyjaśnienia odnośnie reklam opartych na zainteresowaniach od Facebook dostępne są pod następującym linkiem:
Zasady
ochrony
prywatności
w
firmie
Meta
–
gromadzenie
i
wykorzystywanie
danych
dotyczących
użytkowników
w
Meta
|
Centrum
ochrony
prywatności
|
Zarządzaj
swoją
prywatnością
na
Facebooku,
Instagramie
i
w
Messengerze
|
Prywatność
na
Facebooku
Aby zrezygnować z reklam opartych na zainteresowaniach od Facebook, postępuj zgodnie z instrukcjami pod tym linkiem:
https://p
l
-
pl.facebook.com/about/ads
/
.
Facebook twierdzi, że przestrzega zasad regulacji w obszarze reklamy behawioralnej wydanych przez Digital Advertising Alliance. Więcej informacji na temat polityki prywatności Facebook znajdziesz pod tym linkiem:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
4. INNE NARZĘDZIA
Google Analytics
– strona smyk.com oraz aplikacja mobilna wykorzystuje Google Analytics (w przypadku aplikacji mobilnej jest to Google Analytics for Firebase), usługę analizy sieciowej Google Ireland Limited, (adres: Google Building Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland). Wykorzystywany przez nas tryb obejmuje “universal analytics” polegający na przypisaniu danych, sesji i interakcji pomiędzy kilkoma urządzeniami do spseudonimizowanego identyfikatora użytkownika, a tym samym aktywności użytkownika na kilku urządzeniach. Google Analytics wykorzystuje pliki cookies będące plikami tekstowymi instalowanymi na urządzeniach końcowych użytkowników, pozwalające operatorowi strony internetowej analizować sposób korzystania przez nich ze strony. Informacja generowana przez plik cookie jest zwykle przekazywana do serwera Google w USA i tam przechowywana. Twój adres IP trafi na serwery Google w USA. Twój adres IP przekazany przez wykorzystywaną przez Ciebie przeglądarkę w związku z Google Analytics nie jest łączony z innymi informacjami posiadanymi przez Google. Google, w imieniu operatora strony, wykorzysta informację zebrane przez pliki cookies w celu analizy Twojej aktywności na niej, połączenia raportów z Twojej aktywności na stronie lub aplikacji, dostarczenia operatorowi strony innych usług związanych ze stroną i wykorzystywaniem Internetu. Jako że przetwarzanie wyżej wymienionych danych jest niezbędne dla realizacji celów wynikających z prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Smyk, podstawą prawną przetwarzania jest art. 6 ust 1 lit f) RODO), przy czym wyjaśniamy, że nasz prawnie uzasadniony interes obejmuje możliwość pozyskiwania i analizowania informacji w celu badania skuteczności oraz udoskonalania prowadzonej przez nas działalności. Więcej informacji o zasadach ochrony danych znajdziesz pod tymi linkami:
https://marketingplatform.google.com/about/analytics/terms/pl
/
,
https://policies.google.com/?hl=p
l
.
Możesz dezaktywować pliki cookies poprzez wybór odpowiednich ustawień swojej przeglądarki, co może jednak uniemożliwić korzystanie ze wszystkich funkcjonalności strony smyk.com. Możesz też zapobiec zbieraniu i przetwarzaniu przez Google informacji tworzonych przez pliki cookies, a dotyczących Twojej aktywności na stronie smyk.com (w tym adresu IP), instalując odpowiedni dodatek do Twojej przeglądarki dostępny pod tym linkiem:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptou
t
.
Pliki typu opt-out cookies ograniczają zbierania danych w przyszłości. Musisz dokonać blokady na wszystkich wykorzystywanych urządzeniach końcowych.
Google Adwords (konerwsje rozszerzone) -
strona smyk.com korzysta z usługi konwersji rozszerzonych, które jest internetowym programem reklamowym od Google (Google Inc, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA (“Google”)). Konwersje rozszerzone pozwalają nam śledzić i dokumentować działania użytkowników, którzy odwiedzili naszą stronę po obejrzeniu lub kliknięciu jedną z naszych reklam oraz wyrazili zgodę na wykorzystanie przez nas konwersji rozszerzonych klikając przycisk „Akceptuję wszystkie” albo zgodnie z wyborem dokonanym po kliknięciu przycisku „Zarządzaj zgodami” w oknie ustawień preferencji plików cookies i konwersji rozszerzonych pojawiającym się przy wejściu na stronę i
nternetową
www.smyk.com
lub poprzez wybór pola „ustawienia prywatności: w sekcji „Moje konto” na dole strony internetowej
www.smyk.co
m
.
Wyrażenie zgody jest dobrowolne. Gdy użytkownik wykona konwersję na stronie internetowej www.smyk.com, możemy przekazywać dane o takim kliencie (rejestrowane w tagach śledzenia konwersji) w postaci adresu e-mail przekazanego nam przez takiego klienta podczas interakcji z nami w sposób opisany w niniejszej polityce prywatności, które to dane mogą być, szyfrowane, wysyłane przez nas do Google w zaszyfrowanej formie (w sposób zapewniający ochronę prywatności z wykorzystaniem bezpiecznego algorytmu szyfrowania jednokierunkowego o nazwie SHA256) a potem używane do ulepszania pomiaru konwersji. Możesz w każdej chwili zablokować wykorzystanie przez nas konwersji rozszerzonych na stronie internetowej smyk.com w następujący sposób:
zgodnie z wyborem dokonanym w oknie ustawień preferencji plików cookies i konwersji rozszerzonych pojawiającym się przy wejściu na stronę i
nternetową
smyk.com
lub
poprzez wybór pola „ustawienia prywatności” w sekcji „Moje konto” na dole strony internetowej
smyk.com
(z wyjątkiem plików koniecznych) lub
poprzez zmianę ustawienia Twojej przeglądarki internetowej.
Hotjar
- strona smyk.com korzysta z narzędzia Hotjar, usługi badającej zachowanie użytkownika i zbierającej informacje zwrotne od użytkowników naszej strony (Hotjar Ltd, Level 2, St Julians Business Centre, 3, Elia Zammit Street, St Julians STJ 3155, Malta, Europe). Korzystamy z Hotjar, aby lepiej zrozumieć potrzeby naszych użytkowników, a w efekcie optymalizować nasz serwis. Hotjar jest usługą technologiczną, która pomaga nam lepiej zrozumieć doświadczenia użytkowników (np. ile czasu spędzają na jakich stronach, które linki klikają, co użytkownicy lubią, a czego nie itd.), a to pozwala nam budować i usprawniać naszą stronę. Hotjar wykorzystuje pliki cookie i inne technologie do zbierania danych o zachowaniu użytkowników i ich urządzeniach. Składa się na to adres IP urządzenia (przetwarzany podczas sesji oraz przechowywany w formie uniemożliwiającej identyfikację), rozmiar ekranu urządzenia, typ urządzenia (unikalne identyfikatory urządzenia), informacje o przeglądarce, lokalizacja geograficzna (tylko kraj), oraz preferowany język użyty do wyświetlenia naszej strony. Hotjar gromadzi te informacje w naszym imieniu w pseudonimowanym profilu użytkownika. Zgodnie z umową Hotjar nie ma prawa sprzedawać jakichkolwiek danych zebranych w naszym imieniu. Aby uzyskać więcej informacji o Hotjar odwiedź stronę:
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy
/
.
Floodlight
- strona smyk.com korzysta z usługi DoubleClick Floodlight, który jest internetowym programem reklamowym od Google (Google Inc, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA (“Google”)).
Google Floodlight pozwala nam śledzić i dokumentować działania użytkowników, którzy odwiedzili naszą stronę po obejrzeniu lub kliknięciu jedną z naszych reklam. W tym celu na naszej stronie ustawiane są tak zwane tagi floodlight lub pixele użytkowników oraz pliki cookie (pliki cookie DoubleClick). Używamy tej usługi do określenia skuteczności naszych kampanii reklamowych na podstawie poziomu sprzedaży i aktywności użytkownika na naszej stronie. Pliki cookie i tagi Google Floodlight nie zawierają żadnych danych osobowych, a więc nie są wykorzystywane do osobistej identyfikacji. Na przykład możemy określić liczbę użytkowników, którzy dokonali zakupu produktu lub przesłali formularz i używać tych informacji do celów statystycznych, ale nie możemy zidentyfikować użytkownika personalnie. Aby uzyskać więcej informacji o Google Floodlight odwiedź stronę:
http://www.google.com/privacy/ads/
.
GetSiteControl
- nasza strona wykorzystuje elementy wizualne (widżety) usługi GetSiteControl (GetWebCraft Limited Klimentos 41-43, Klimentos Tower, Flat / Office 25, 1061, Nicosia, Cyprus). GetSiteControl to narzędzie wyświetlające na stronie wyskakujące okna, które znajdują się tam w celach informacyjnych (np. informacja o promocji lub otwarciu sklepów). Oknami można sterować zgodnie z pewnymi zasadami (np. liczbą odwiedzin na stronie), dlatego narzędzie GetSiteControl instaluje pliki cookie. Aby uzyskać więcej informacji o GetSiteControl odwiedź stronę:
https://getsitecontrol.com/privacy
/
.
NetSalesMedia - w ramach zawartej z Cube Group S.A. umowy smyk.com, korzysta z technologii śledzenia Ingenious Technologies, która umożliwia stworzenie połączenia między kliknięciem przez użytkownika w reklamę (lub wyświetleniem reklamy) w przeglądarce internetowej, a wykonaną przez niego akcją na stronie jak np. zakup. W każdej interakcji z reklamą Twoja przeglądarka wysyła do serwera Ingenious żądanie HTTP, które przekazuje określone informacje. Informacje te obejmują adres URL strony internetowej, na której umieszczona jest reklama (adres wcześniej odwiedzonej strony odsyłającej (tzw. referrer URL)), identyfikator przeglądarki (user agent) Twojego urządzenia końcowego (łącznie z danymi dotyczącymi typu urządzenia i systemu operacyjnego), adres IP urządzenia końcowego (ten adres IP jest przez nas anonimizowany przed zapisaniem), nagłówek HTTP (pakiet zawierający różne dane techniczne przesyłane automatycznie przez Twoją przeglądarkę), czas wysłania żądania oraz, o ile został już zapisany na urządzeniu końcowym, plik cookie i całą jego zawartość. Cookie to fragment danych wymieniany między Twoją przeglądarką, a serwerem. Mogą w nim być zapisywane i przesyłane informacje istotne dla aplikacji internetowej, np. zawartość wirtualnego koszyka zakupów. Technologia śledzenia przechowuje pliki cookie na Twoim urządzeniu końcowym w celu dokumentowania działań. W pliku cookie zapisywane są informacje na temat najnowszych interakcji z reklamą (tj. informacje, kiedy wyświetlono konkretną reklamę lub kliknięto na nią na urządzeniu końcowym). W pliku cookie zapisywany jest również utworzony przez system mierzący identyfikator cookie. Za pomocą tego identyfikatora cookies zapisywane są dane o zaistniałych interakcjach oraz informacje o działaniach użytkownika. Zapisane interakcje mogą być w razie potrzeby zestawione ze sobą w celu rejestracji całego procesu decyzji i działań użytkownika. W przypadku żądania wykonania działania, numer zamówienia i wartość koszyka zakupów użytkownika są zazwyczaj również przesyłane i zapisywane przez technologię Ingenious. Oprócz tego mogą być przesyłane i zapisywane następujące dane: Twój identyfikator klienta, nowy atrybut klienta, wiek i płeć oraz informacje podane w ankiecie dla smyk.com Wyłącznym celem przekazanych nam informacji oraz plików cookie jest prawidłowa ocena skuteczności reklamy i związanej z nią faktury.
Gromadzenie i przetwarzanie danych śledzących można dezaktywować za pomocą ustawień przeglądarki lub klikając na link "tracking opt-out":
https://marketing.tr.netsalesmedia.pl/ts/i5534777/tsv?settrackingoptou
t
.
Po kliknięciu na link "tracking opt-out" zapisywany jest specjalny plik cookie, który dezaktywuje śledzenie w przeglądarce internetowej aktualnie używanej w urządzeniu końcowym. Jeżeli jednak usuniesz plik cookie z opcją "tracking opt-out", funkcja śledzenia zostanie ponownie aktywowana.
Buy.Box - strona smyk.com wykorzystuje narzędzie BUY.BOX, której właścicielem jest firma Simply4net Sp. z o.o., ul. Królowej Jadwigi 43, 61-871 Poznań. Skrypty BUY.BOX zamieszczone na stronie naszego sklepu identyfikują cookie pozwalającego powiązać transakcję z serwisem www, z którego przekierowany został użytkownik za pośrednictwem BUY.BOX. W ramach trackingu rejestrowane są dane: z jakiego serwisu www nastąpiło wejście do sklepu, na jaki produkt nastąpiło wejście do sklepu, jakie produkty w sklepie przeglądał użytkownik oraz jakie produkty znajdowały się w zamówieniu danego klienta sklepu.
Android Advertising Identifier i Advertising Identifier for iOS
- aplikacja Smyk używa identyfikatorów reklamowych Android Advertising ID oraz Advertising Identifier for iOS.
Gdy korzystasz z naszej aplikacji mobilnej, możemy automatycznie rejestrować Twój identyfikator reklamowy AdID (jeśli korzystasz z urządzenia z Androidem) lub identyfikator reklamowy IDFA (jeśli korzystasz z urządzenia z systemem iOS) do celów reklamowych lub analitycznych. Identyfikatory z których korzysta aplikacja są dostarczane przez system operacyjny urządzenia mobilnego i mogą zostać zresetowane przez użytkownika. Zebrane informacje mogą być również przechowywane na Twoim urządzeniu. Zobacz poniżej, jak możesz zresetować mobilny identyfikator reklamowy lub zrezygnować z otrzymywania ukierunkowanych reklam za pośrednictwem mobilnych identyfikatorów reklamowych. W systemie iOS: Każde urządzenie z systemem iOS zawiera identyfikator reklamowy (IDFA) z dwiema kluczowymi funkcjami:
•
Użytkownicy mogą zresetować identyfikator w dowolnym momencie.
•
Użytkownicy mogą dobrowolnie zrezygnować z subskrypcji, aktywując ograniczenie śledzenia reklam (Limit Śledzenia reklam lub LAT).
W systemie Android: Każde urządzenie z systemem Android zawiera identyfikator reklamowy (AAID). Aby dobrowolnie anulować subskrypcję lub zmienić konfigurację, musisz wykonać następujące kroki:
Jeśli używasz Androida 2.3 lub nowszego, wybierz „Ustawienia Google” w folderze aplikacji.
Wybierz „Reklamy”.
Wybierz „Zresetuj swój identyfikator reklamowy”, aby wygenerować nowy identyfikator i usunąć wcześniej zapisane dane.
•
Wybierz „Wyłącz reklamy oparte na zainteresowaniach”.
Przeczytaj szczegółowe informacje na temat swojego urządzenia, aby dowiedzieć się więcej o swoich osobistych preferencjach reklamowych:
Android:
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/266292
2
;
iOS:
https://support.apple.com/e
n
-
il/HT205223
Zowie Chat
- Smyk korzysta z narzędzia typu „chat/chatbot” dostarczanego przez firmę Chatbotize sp. z o.o. (https://getzowie.com/) aby zaoferować Ci dodatkowy kanał komunikacji. Możliwość czatowania daje użytkownikowi aplikacja komunikatora zaimplementowana na stronie smyk.com i w aplikacji mobilnej, służąca do prowadzenia w czasie rzeczywistym konwersacji pomiędzy Tobą a Centrum Obsługi Klienta oraz program komputerowy, którego funkcjonalność polega na zautomatyzowanym prowadzeniu z Tobą interaktywnej konwersacji przy użyciu predefiniowanych scenariuszy. Wspomniane narzędzia nie wymagają procesu instalacji oprogramowania na Twoim urządzeniu końcowym. Dostęp do narzędzia typu „chat/chatbot” uzyskuje się przez kliknięcie w link, widget lub przycisk kontaktowy na stronie smyk.com lub aplikacji lub poprzez interakcję w otwartym oknie tego narzędzia. Konsultant Centrum Obsługi Klienta otrzymuje informacje, które podałeś podczas kontaktu (również zanim nacisnąłeś przycisk „wyślij”) a także informacje dotyczące ścieżki Twojego poruszania się po stronie smyk.com lub aplikacji przed rozpoczęciem konwersacji a także inne informacje dotyczące Twojej wizyty w tym czas przebywania na stronie smyk.com, informacje o wcześniej przeglądanych podstronach strony smyk.com, informacje liczbie wizyt na stronie smyk.com, Twoje zamówienie oraz położenie Twojego kursora na stronie smyk.com, aby mógł reagować szybciej na Twoje zapytania i jak najszybciej Ci pomóc. Dane wrażliwe takie dane dot. płatności nie są widoczne dla konsultanta.
W celu monitorowania jakości obsługi zawartość Twojej rozmowy z konsultantem Centrum Obsługi Klienta może być przekazana innemu konsultantowi lub osobom ich nadzorującym. Dane z usług chat przechowywane są przez okres 90 dni ww. zasobach platformy Zowie Chat oraz 5 lat w zasobach SMYK, abyśmy mogli pomóc Ci w przyszłości i udoskonalać nasze usługi przedłużony o czas przedawnienia się roszczeń.
XII. POSTANOWIENIA KOŃCOWE
Niniejsza polityka prywatności obowiązuje od dnia 5 stycznia 2025 roku.
W związku z ciągłym rozwojem i postępem techniki zasady określone w niniejszym dokumencie mogą ulec zmianie. O zmianie tych zasad zostaniesz poinformowany z odpowiednim wyprzedzeniem, nie później niż na 7 dni przed ich wprowadzeniem, poprzez zamieszczenie nowej treści niniejszego dokumentu na stronie internetowej
www.smyk.com/polityka
-
prywatnosci
.
Archiwalna polityka prywatności.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://www.google.com/privacy/ads/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Advertising
Advertising keeps Google and many of the websites and services you use free of charge. We work hard to make sure that ads are safe, unobtrusive, and as relevant as possible. For example, you won’t see pop-up ads on Google, and we terminate the accounts of hundreds of thousands of publishers and advertisers that violate our policies each year – including ads containing malware, ads for counterfeit goods, or ads that attempt to misuse your personal information.
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses cookies in advertising
Cookies help to make advertising more effective. Without cookies, it’s harder for an advertiser to reach its audience, or to know how many ads were shown and how many clicks they received.
Many websites, such as news sites and blogs, partner with Google to show ads to their visitors. Working with our partners, we may use cookies for a number of purposes, such as to stop you from seeing the same ad over and over again, to detect and stop click fraud, and to show ads that are likely to be more relevant (such as ads based on websites you have visited).
We store a record of the ads we serve in our logs. These
server logs
typically include your web request, IP address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser or, if you are signed-in, that may uniquely identify you. We store this data for a number of reasons, the most important of which are to improve our services and to maintain the security of our systems. We anonymize this log data by removing part of the IP address (after 9 months) and cookie information (after 18 months).
Our advertising cookies
To help our partners manage their advertising and websites, we offer many products, including AdSense, AdWords, Google Analytics, and a range of DoubleClick-branded services. When you visit a page or see an ad that uses one of these products, either on Google services or on other sites and apps, various cookies may be sent to your browser.
These may be set from a few different domains, including google.com, doubleclick.net, googlesyndication.com, or googleadservices.com, or the domain of our partners’ sites. Some of our advertising products enable our partners to use other services in conjunction with ours (like an ad measurement and reporting service), and these services may send their own cookies to your browser. These cookies will be set from their domains.
See more detail about the
types of cookies used by Google
and our partners and
how we use them
.
How you can control advertising cookies
You can use
ad settings
to manage the Google ads you see and turn off personalized ads. Even if you turn off personalized ads, you may still see ads based on factors such as your general location derived from your IP address, your browser type, and your search terms.
You can also manage many companies’ cookies used for online advertising via the consumer choice tools created under self-regulation programs in many countries, such as the US-based
aboutads.info choices
page or the EU-based
Your Online Choices
.
Finally, you can
manage cookies in your web browser
.
Other technologies used in advertising
Google’s advertising systems may use other technologies, including Flash and HTML5, for functions like display of interactive ad formats. We may use the
IP address
, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also select advertising based on information about your computer or device, such as the time and date, your device model, browser type, or sensors in your device like the accelerometer.
Location
Google’s ad products may receive or infer information about your location from a variety of sources. For example, we may use the IP address to identify your general location; we may receive precise location from your mobile device; we may infer your location from your search queries; and websites or apps that you use may send information about your location to us.  Google uses location information in our ads products to infer demographic information, to improve the relevance of the ads you see, to measure ad performance and to report aggregate statistics to advertisers.
Advertising identifiers for mobile apps
To serve ads in services where cookie technology may not be available (for example, in mobile applications), we may use technologies that perform similar functions to cookies. Sometimes Google links the identifier used for advertising on mobile applications to an advertising cookie on the same device in order to coordinate ads across your mobile apps and mobile browser. This can happen, for example, when you see an ad within an app that launches a web page in your mobile browser. This also helps us improve the reports we give to our advertisers on the effectiveness of their campaigns.
Ads you see on your device may be personalized based on its Advertising ID. On Android devices, you can:
Reset your device’s advertising ID
, which replaces the current ID with a new one. Apps can still show you personalized ads, but for a while they may not be as relevant or interesting to you.
Delete your device’s advertising ID
, which deletes the advertising ID and doesn't assign a new one. Apps can still show you ads, but they may not be as relevant or interesting to you. You won't see ads based on this advertising ID, but you may still see ads based on other factors, like the information you’ve shared with apps.
To make changes to the advertising ID on your Android device, follow the instructions below.
Android
Reset your device’s advertising ID
To reset your device’s advertising ID:
On your Android device, go to
Settings
.
Tap
Privacy
>
Ads
.
Tap
Reset advertising ID
and confirm your changes.
Delete your device’s advertising ID
To delete your device’s advertising ID:
On your Android device, go to
Settings
.
Tap
Privacy
>
Ads
.
Tap
Delete advertising ID
and confirm your changes.
Your advertising ID will be reset or deleted, but apps may have their own settings using other types of identifiers, which can also affect the types of ads you see.
On some older versions of Android
If your Android device’s version is 4.4 or older:
Open
Settings
Tap
Privacy
>
Advanced
>
Ads
Turn on
Opt out of Ads Personalization
and confirm your changes.
iOS
Devices with iOS use Apple’s Advertising Identifier. To learn more about your choices for use of this identifier, visit the
Settings
app on your device.
Connected TV/Over-the-Top
Advertising identifiers for connected TV
Connected TVs are another area where cookie technology is not available, and, instead, Google will rely on device identifiers designed for use in advertising to serve ads. Many connected TV devices support an identifier for advertising that is similar in function to mobile device identifiers. These identifiers are built to give users the option to reset them or to opt out of personalized advertising entirely.
The following “Ads” settings are available on TVs with the following consistent language:
Reset advertising ID
Delete advertising ID
Opt out of Ads Personalization (on or off)
Ads by Google (links to About Google ad personalization)
Your advertising ID (long string)
These Ads settings are available in the following paths on Google TV and Android TV respectively.
Google TV
Consistent path to Ads:
Settings
Privacy
Ads
Android TV
Ads settings show up in one of two general paths for Android TV depending on the TV manufacturer/model. In Android TV, partners have the freedom to adapt the Settings path. It’s up to the partner which path they use to best fit their custom TV experience but below are the common paths to Ad settings.
Path A:
Settings
About
Legal Information
Ads
Path B:
Settings
Devices Preferences
About
Legal Information
Ads
Non-Google Devices
Many connected TV devices support identifiers for advertising and offer ways for users to opt out of personalized advertising. A full list of those devices, and ways users can opt out, is kept updated on the Network Advertising Initiative’s website here:
https://thenai.org/opt-out/connected-tv-choices/
.
What determines the ads by Google that I see?
Many decisions are made to determine which ad you see.
Sometimes the ad you see is based on your current or past location. Your IP address is usually a good indication of your approximate location. So you might see an ad on the homepage of YouTube.com that promotes a forthcoming movie in your country, or a search for ‘pizza’ might return results for pizza places in your town.
Sometimes the ad you see is based on the context of a page. If you’re looking at a page of gardening tips, you might see ads for gardening equipment.
Sometimes you might also see an ad on the web that’s based on your app activity or activity on Google services; an in-app ad that’s based on your web activity; or an ad based on your activity on another device.
Sometimes the ad you see on a page is served by Google but selected by another company. For example, you might have registered with a newspaper website. From information you’ve given the newspaper, it can make decisions about which ads to show you, and it can use Google’s ad serving products to deliver those ads.
The ad you see on a household device, such as a connected TV (such as a Smart TV), may be related to the web or app activity from devices within the same household.
You may also see ads on Google products and services, including Search, Gmail, and YouTube, based on information, such as your email address, that you provided to advertisers and the advertisers then shared with Google.
Why am I seeing ads by Google for products I’ve viewed?
You may see ads for products you previously viewed. Let’s suppose you visit a website that sells golf clubs, but you don’t buy those clubs on your first visit. The website owner might want to encourage you to return and complete your purchase. Google offers services that let website operators target their ads to people who visited their pages.
For this to work, Google either reads a cookie that’s already in your browser or places a cookie in your browser when you visit the golfing site (assuming your browser lets this happen).
When you visit another site that works with Google, which may have nothing to do with golfing, you might see an ad for those golf clubs. That’s because your browser sends Google the same cookie. In turn, we may use that cookie to serve you an ad that could encourage you to buy those golf clubs.
Your visit to the golfing site may also be used by Google to show you personalized ads when you later search for golf clubs on Google.
We do have restrictions on this type of ad. For example, we prohibit advertisers from selecting an audience based on sensitive information, such as health information or religious beliefs.
Learn more about
Google ads
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 1
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024
|
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 2
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/:
Are you an agency specialized in UX, digital marketing, or growth? Join our
Partner Program
Close banner
Hotjar Logo
Products
Solutions
Pricing
Case studies
Resources
Contact Sales
Sign in
Get started
English
Language
Get started
Toggle navigation menu
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Improving websites, for you.
Online businesses use Hotjar to create better website experiences.
Nobody wants to waste their time on a website that is confusing and hard to navigate.
You know it, we know it, and website owners know it too—which is why they turn to Hotjar.
Website owners use Hotjar to better understand user behavior: what actions people take on a website, what elements of a page they click or ignore, what they enjoy, where they struggle. With this insight, website owners can then make changes that improve the overall experience for all website users. And that includes you.
Show more
We record interactions, not your sensitive data.
Hotjar is designed for websites to get insights. And respect your privacy.
When you browse a website that has Hotjar installed, we collect data about your interactions (e.g. where you click, scroll your mouse, move in between pages) and use it to create visual representations of the experience. Website owners get these insights without tracking IP/MAC addresses-- the stuff that relates to the device you use.
Some Hotjar tools, like session recordings, reconstruct the individual actions you took during a website visit; others, like heatmaps, aggregate data points from you and hundreds of other visitors in one report.
But in all cases, by default, sensitive data that you might enter on the site (your credit card details or phone numbers) will never reach our servers: we cannot see it, and neither can the website owner. Hotjar customers viewing a session recording will only see asterisks (‘***’ ) instead of numbers.
For more information, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
We will never share or sell your data.
Not to advertisers. Not to third-party services. Not to anyone.
Nobody here at Hotjar likes the idea of tools following us around different websites or companies sharing and selling our data without our permission. We are committed to making sure this doesn’t happen to you, either.
Hotjar is designed to help make websites easier to use, and the data we track about your website visit (for example, what and where you click) is only used for this purpose. We don’t follow you around the Internet: website owners who use Hotjar cannot see or find out about your activity on sites they don’t own. Likewise, we don’t harvest personal data or sell it to anyone, ever, for any reason. Nor do we mine it for profiling or advertising purposes.
To learn more about data privacy, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Request and access your data, anytime.
Your data is stored securely, and you can ask to see it whenever you want.
As a website visitor, you have the right to request access to the personal identifiable information a website owner collected and stored about you. You also have the right to request that this information is deleted.
At any time, you can request a website owner who uses Hotjar to give you access to your data. They can run a search for personal data from inside the Hotjar dashboard; the system will then generate and email you a report that lets you view, and delete, any data connected with you.
To learn more about data privacy and accessing your data, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Tracking: we'll always give you options.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you want to stop a website using Hotjar from collecting data about your visit, you should know that the website owner is responsible for getting your consent to collect and process data about your visit (and must allow you to withdraw that consent as well).
But we understand that you might want Hotjar (and other tools) to not process data about you regardless of whether a site owner asks for permission or not, so we want to give you an extra option. If you put a ‘Do Not Track’ flag on your browser, Hotjar will look for it before we collect any data about your site visit. Not everybody does that, but we do.
For more information about this take a look at our
guide on how ‘Do Not Track’ in your browser works
.
Show more
Compliance commitment: GDPR, CCPA, and more.
Our customers can use Hotjar in a compliant manner, for you.
We have followed a ‘privacy by design’ approach since our very first day, back in 2014, so we’re big supporters of privacy acts and regulations like the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), and the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD) that enhance your privacy rights and protection as a consumer.
We have built the necessary controls around anonymity and consent to make sure website owners who use Hotjar can do it in a compliant manner. Plus, our legal team is fully committed to keeping up-to-date with any changes in the law and making sure they are reflected in our product.
You can read more about GDPR, CCPA, LGPD, and our other commitments over in our
Compliance resources.
Show more
Questions? We’ve got you covered.
From FAQs to in-depth resources - our help center has everything you need to know about Hotjar relating to privacy, compliance, legal, and security.
Take me there
Sub-policy 3
https://getsitecontrol.com/privacy/:
Getsitecontrol
Solutions
Widgets
Create email opt-in forms, promo
bars, surveys & exit popups.
Automations
Set up automated workflows and let them work while you sleep.
Contacts
Get your contact list organized and
build audience segments.
Broadcasts
Send promotional emails about new products, sales, and events.
Shopify App
Install Getsitecontrol app for Shopify and grow your store faster.
Templates
Widget templates
Choose among premade signup forms, promo banners & bars.
Email templates
Discover professional email templates for different occasions.
Resources
Blog
Fresh ideas and actionable guides to
help you grow your online business.
Help center
Questions about Getsitecontrol?
Find answers in our knowledge base.
Use cases
Find out how to use widgets, with detailed tutorials and examples.
Community
Stay in the loop and access new templates in our Slack community.
Pricing
Products
Getsitecontrol
Popups & inline forms, email marketing and automated workflows.
Aurora theme for Shopify
A flexible and feature-rich Shopify theme to express your unique style.
Apps for Shopify
Apps for Shopify stores developed under the GSC umbrella brand.
Getform
Online forms & link trees for your brand. Generate leads without a website.
Log in
Sign up free
Privacy policy
This Privacy Policy should be reviewed alongside our Terms of Service. By using our Website, Services, and Apps, you acknowledge that you have read and agreed to both documents.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) outlines how Getwebcraft Limited (“Getwebcraft,” “we,” “us,” or “our” as appropriate) collects, stores, utilizes, and shares your information during your interactions with our
Website
and the usage of our products and services (collectively, “Services”), including but not limited to the applications accessible on the
Shopify platform
. It also describes your rights in relation to your personal information.
By visiting our website and utilizing our Services, you give consent to the collection, transfer, manipulation, storage, disclosure, and other forms of using your information, as described within this Privacy Policy.
Note that this Privacy Policy is an essential aspect of both the terms and conditions that oversee the use of our Website and any applicable terms and conditions that relate to the use of our Apps.
1. Introduction
1.1 We are committed to safeguarding the privacy of our website visitors and service users. A visitor of our website or end user of our service is referred to as “you”, “your(s)” or “yourself”.
1.2 This policy applies where we are acting as a data controller with respect to the Personally Identifiable Information (hereinafter to be referred to as “PII”), as defined in Article 4 of the GDPR, of our website visitors and service users; in other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of that personal data.
1.3 This Privacy Policy also applies to the transfer of personal data from the UK to countries outside of the UK. We use the UK Addendum to ensure that personal data is transferred in a secure and compliant manner.
1.4 Our website incorporates privacy controls that affect how we will process your personal data. By using the privacy controls, you can specify whether you would like to receive direct marketing communications. You can access the privacy controls via your Getsitecontrol dashboard.
1.5 In addition, the terms “collect”, “process”, “treat”, “use”, “share”, “disclose”, “divulge” and analogous words shall refer to your PII and other data collected from our visitors and end users.
1.6 From time to time, this Policy may be translated into other languages for your convenience. The English language version of each of these documents shall be the version that prevails and governs your use of Website and our products and services.
2. Information We Collect
2.1 When you visit and use our Website, sign up for our Services and Apps, or contact the Getwebcraft team, we may ask you to provide us with some PII that can be used to contact or identify you, and information on your use or potential use of the Services. PII that we might collect includes information like your email address and name. PII may also include other information you supply to us concerning your preferences and interests expressed while using the Services and Apps.
By providing us with this information, you consent to your information being collected, used, disclosed, and stored by us in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We will only collect personal data that is necessary for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy. We will not collect any Special Categories of Personal Data (such as data about race, religion, or health) without your explicit consent.
2.2 We use your PII to administer your account and provide you services, to send communications and administrative emails, to respond to your inquiries, and to send marketing and product update messages to those who ask for such messages. Overall, through the provision of its Services, Getwebcraft will collect the following types of PII:
Personal Information
Personal Information includes information that can be used to personally identify an individual person, including but not limited to: first name, last name, title, date of birth, billing address, email address and telephone numbers.
Accordingly, you hereby represent and warrant to Getwebcraft that you have the necessary rights and authorizations required for the disclosure of any and all PII.
Personal Information collected by Getwebcraft includes: Name and Email
Non-Personal Information
Non-Personal Information includes information that cannot be used to personally identify an individual person, such as: general demographic information, anonymous usage data including number of clicks, platform types, preferences you submit and preferences that are generated based on the data you submit.
Personal Information Collected via Third-Party Tools
Personal Information Collected via Third-Party Tools includes such information as aggregated user statistics, analytics, demographic information, and web site usage information. As our user, you will generally be able to control and select the amount and type of PII you may disclose to us.
Personal Information Collected via Social Media Integration
We may allow our users to use single sign-on authentication services such as those provided by Facebook, Google, and others (if applicable). Henceforth, the Site might provide an option of using your social media credentials and, thus, by such action, we will collect your PII as given by such third party platforms, but never more than the PII these platforms disclose. If you close your social media account, or if you deauthorize our access, your access to our website may be suspended. For more information, please read the terms and policies of such third-party platforms.
Technical Information Collected via our website
As you navigate through the website, certain information can be passively collected (that is, gathered without you actively providing the information) using various technologies and means, such as Internet Protocol addresses, cookies, Internet tags, and navigational data collection.
Internet Protocol (IP) addresses
An IP Address is a number assigned to your computer by your Internet service provider so you can access the Internet and is generally considered to be non-personally identifiable information, because in most cases an IP address is dynamic (changing each time you connect to the Internet), rather than static (unique to a particular user's computer). We use your IP address to diagnose problems with our server, report aggregate information, determine the fastest route for your computer to connect to our Website, and administer and improve services to our consumers.
Cookies
A “cookie” is a bit of information that a website sends to your web browser that helps the site remember information about you and your preferences. “Session cookies” are temporary bits of information that are erased once you exit your web browser window or otherwise turn your computer off. Session cookies are used to improve navigation on websites and to collect aggregate statistical information.
Persistent Cookies
Persistent cookies are more permanent bits of information that are placed on the hard drive of your computer and stay there unless you delete the cookie. Persistent cookies store information on your computer for a number of purposes, such as retrieving certain information you have previously provided (e.g., username), helping to determine which areas of the website visitors find most valuable, and customizing the website based on your preferences.
Internet tags
Internet tags, also known as single-pixel GIFs, clear GIFs, invisible GIFs, and 1-by-1 GIFs, are smaller than cookies and tell the Site's server information such as the IP address and browser type related to the visitor's computer.
Navigational data
Navigational data is also known as “log files,” “server logs”, “clickstream” data and “Internet Tags”, and used for system management, to improve the content of the site, market research purposes, and to communicate information to visitors.
2.3 We do not collect any Special Categories of Personal Data about you (this includes details about your race or ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, sex life, sexual orientation, political opinions, trade union membership, information about your health, and genetic and biometric data). Nor do we collect any information about criminal convictions and offences.
2.4 We also collect, use and share Aggregated Data such as statistical or demographic data for any purpose. Aggregated Data could be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data in law as this data will not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users accessing a specific website feature. However, if we combine or connect Aggregated Data with your personal data so that it can directly or indirectly identify you, we treat the combined data as personal data which will be used in accordance with this privacy policy.
2.5 You can instruct your device or browser, by changing its options, to stop accepting cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie. If you do not accept cookies, however, you may not be able to use all functionality of our Services.
2.6 When we send emails to our registered customers, we may track who opened the emails and who clicked on any of the hyperlinks. We do this to measure the performance of our email campaigns, and to improve our offerings.
3. Third-party links and services
3.1 It is possible that our Website or our Apps will contain links to third-party websites and services. Please remember that when you use a link to go from our Website to another website or you request a service from a third party, this privacy policy no longer applies.
3.2 Your browsing and interaction on any other website, or your dealings with any other third-party service provider, is subject to that website’s or third-party service provider’s own rules and policies.
3.3 We do not monitor, control, or endorse the privacy practices of any third parties.
3.4 We encourage you to become familiar with the privacy practices of every website you visit or third party service provider that you deal with and to contact them if you have any questions about their respective privacy policies and practices.
3.5 This privacy policy applies solely to personal information collected by us through our Website and functionality and does not apply to these third-party websites and third-party service providers.
4. Use and Disclosure of Personal Information
4.1 We use your personal information to provide you with our services, to communicate with you, to improve our services, and to protect our legal rights. We may also share your personal information with third parties, such as our payment processors.
4.2 We do not use or disclose your PII without your consent unless one of the following circumstances applies:
We will need to use your PII in order to comply with the obligations we have under the service agreement we have with you.
We may share aggregated information with third parties that does not include PII and we may otherwise disclose aggregated service usage information with third parties.
We will use the information you provide to bill and collect sums owed to us. Uses for this purpose include sending you emails, invoices, receipts, and notices of delinquency, to alert you if we need a different credit card number, and to otherwise try to collect money owed. Financial transactions relating to our website and services are handled by our payment services providers called Adyen, Bluesnap, and PayPal. We advise you to read and agree to their terms and conditions and their privacy policy as well when using our Website. We will share transaction data with our payment services providers only to the extent necessary for the purposes of processing your payments, refunding such payments and dealing with complaints and queries relating to such payments and refunds.
We may send you informational and promotional content in accordance with your marketing preferences. You can stop receiving our promotional emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in every email.
We may use your information to request feedback and to contact you about your use of our website, to administer a contest, promotion, survey or other site feature.
We may use your information as part of our efforts to keep our website safe and secure (for example, for fraud monitoring and prevention).
We may use your information and PII as supporting items in order to enforce our terms, conditions and policies for business purposes, to comply with legal and regulatory requirements or in connection with our contract, as well as to respond to legal requests and prevent harm. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond. We may send you system alert messages. For example, we may inform you of temporary or permanent changes to our Services, such as planned outages, new features, version updates, releases, abuse warnings, and changes to our Privacy policy.
We may share Personal information with third parties if access, use, or disclosure of such information is necessary to (a) satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process or an enforceable governmental request, (b) enforce the applicable Terms of service, including investigation of potential violations thereof, (c) detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues, or (d) protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Getwebcraft, its users or the public as required or permitted by law.
If our business is sold or merges in whole or in part with another business that would become responsible for providing the website to you, we retain the right to transfer your PII to the new business. The new business would retain the right to use your PII according to the terms of this Privacy Policy as well as to any changes to this privacy notice as instituted by the new business. We will also retain the right to transfer your PII if our company files for bankruptcy and some or all of our assets are sold to another individual or business.
4.3 In order to provide our services, we use third-party platforms and tools, such as those provided by PayPal, Google and Amazon, among other providers. Please be aware that such platforms are governed by their own terms, policies and personal data collection practices and policies. Accordingly, by acknowledging your consent to this Policy, you are also acknowledging the applicable terms and conditions of such third-party platforms, which provide functionalities that include aggregated statistics. Upon the case of any discrepancy or conflict among this Policy and the terms of them, the terms of the latter entities will govern. We will keep a list of any sub-processors that will be involved in the processing of your PII due to the provision of our service and will inform you of any intended material changes concerning the addition or replacement of sub-processors before such changes are effective, thereby giving you the opportunity to object to such changes.
4.4 Finally, we may disclose your information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding potential violations of our policies, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person and illegal activities, or as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
5. Retaining and Deleting Personal Data
5.1 Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not be kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those purposes.
5.2 We will only retain your personal data for as long as reasonably necessary to fulfill the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements. We may retain your personal data for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation with respect to our relationship with you.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or other requirements.
6. Your Privacy Rights as Data Subject
6.1 As we mentioned hereabove, for the purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation or GDPR, for European Union residents and United Kingdom residents, Getwebcraft is a “data controller” of the PII you provide to us for the primary purposes of providing you with our services.
This section below covers the certain situations that you, as data subject, and we as a data controller, are most likely to see, but you should also carefully review the full list of data subject rights here:
https://gdpr-info.eu/chapter-3/
and
https://gdpr-info.eu/chapter-4/
You have the right to be informed about the PII we collect from you, and how we process it. For our EU and UK customers and users, by signing up, you agree to the terms and conditions of our services and hereby acknowledge, agree, and unequivocally consent to the collection, processing, management, treatment, transfer, and authorization of your PII by Getwebcraft, its affiliates, and authorized third parties.
If you are a resident of Switzerland, the contact details for the data protection authorities are available here:
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home.html
.
6.2 You can request information provided are “forgotten”; that is, to have your entire PII removed from our service. If we are asked to do this, in accordance with Article 17 GDPR, we will remove any PII we collected from you as requested. We will also need to contact any third parties that process your PII on our behalf, such as our cloud service providers. To ensure that any personal data in the possession of Getwebcraft can be removed in a timely manner, you can relay any request to be “forgotten” to us by submitting a request.
6.3 As a data subject, in accordance with Article 15 GDPR, you have the right to obtain confirmation as to whether or not we process your personal data and, where we do, access the personal data. You can always ask us to confirm how and where your PII is being stored and processed. You also have the right to know how that data is shared with third parties by us.
6.4 As a data subject, in accordance with Article 16 GDPR, you have the right to have any inaccurate PII about you rectified and, taking into account the purposes of the processing, to have any incomplete PII data about you completed.
6.5 In some circumstances you have the right to the erasure of your personal data without undue delay. Those circumstances include: the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed; you withdraw consent for consent-based processing; you object to the processing under certain rules of applicable data protection law; the processing is for direct marketing purposes; and/or the personal data have been unlawfully processed. However, there are exclusions of the right to erasure. The general exclusions include situations where processing is necessary: for exercising the right of freedom of expression and information; for compliance with a legal obligation or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
6.6 In some circumstances you have the right to restrict the processing of your personal data. Those circumstances are: you contest the accuracy of the personal data; processing is unlawful but you oppose erasure; we no longer need the personal data for the purposes of our processing, but you require personal data for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; and you have objected to processing, pending the verification of that objection. Where processing has been restricted on this basis, we may continue to store your personal data. However, we will only otherwise process it: with your consent; for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person; or for reasons of important public interest.
6.7 In accordance with Article 18 GDPR, you have the right to object to our processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation, but only to the extent that the legal basis for the processing is that the processing is necessary for:
the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of any official authority vested in us;
direct marketing (including profiling);
processing for purposes of scientific/historical research and statistics;
in relation to automated decision-making and profiling;
or the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. If you make such an objection, we will cease to process the personal information unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing is for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
6.8 In accordance with Article 20 GDPR, our users located in the EU, EEA or/and UK may request Getwebcraft to send them any PII in our possession. In this case, we will provide you with any PII that you have in a commonly used, machine-readable format.
6.9 You have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affects you.
6.10 To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your personal information is consent, in accordance with Article 7 (3) GDPR, you have the right to withdraw that consent at any time. Withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of processing before the withdrawal.
6.11 You have the right to file a complaint with supervisory authorities if your information has not been processed in compliance with the GDPR. In accordance with Article 77 GDPR, if the supervisory authorities fail to address your complaint properly, you may have the right to a judicial remedy.
6.12 With respect to data transfers from controllers to processors and/or processors to processors, standard contractual clauses pursuant to Article 28(7) of Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (including enforceable data subject rights and effective legal remedies, pursuant to Article 46(1) and Article 46(2)(c) of Regulation 2016/679), we act as a data exporter/controller transferring any data provided to us to the data importer/processor. We may transfer the information you provide to us to contractors and affiliated organisations that may be located outside of your home country. By agreeing to use our service and website, you hereby agree to such transfer. It is our responsibility to ensure such third parties agree to the same level of confidentiality as we have with you. As a data exporter, we will make all reasonable efforts to determine that the data importer is able, through the implementation of appropriate technical and organisational measures provide the required service and protect any data provided to them. We will also ensure the data provided to the data importer are used only for specific reasons to which you have consented or as may be required to provide our services to you.
6.13 This Privacy Policy complies with the
relevant SCCs
and the UK Addendum. We use these mechanisms to ensure that your personal information is transferred securely and in a compliant manner when it is transferred from the European Economic Area (EEA) or the United Kingdom (UK) to the United States of America (USA).
6.14 You may exercise any of your rights in relation to your PII data by means of a written notice to us. Your privacy notice request must include, at the least, the following information: (i) your complete name, address and/or e-mail address in order for us to notify you the response to your request; (ii) attached documents establishing your identity; and (iii) a clear and concise description of the PII with regard to which you seek to enforce any of your privacy rights. If you request rectification, please indicate amendments to be made and attach documentation to back up your request.
Upon receipt of your written privacy notice request, and after due review, we may then edit, deactivate and/or delete your PII from our services within thirty (30) days. In case of secure databases under our control where deletion is impossible, we will make such information permanently inaccessible.
7. Safeguarding Your Information
7.1 We are committed to keeping the personal information you provide us secure and we will take reasonable precautions to protect your personal data from loss, misuse and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction, taking into account the risks involved in the processing and the nature of the personal data.
7.2 You can be assured that personal information collected through the website is secure and is maintained in a manner consistent with current industry standards, but please remember that no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure. While we strive to use commercially acceptable means to protect your information, we cannot guarantee its absolute security.
7.3 We have implemented information security policies, rules and technical measures to protect the personal information that we have under our control from:
unauthorized access;
improper use or disclosure;
unauthorized modification; and
unlawful destruction or accidental loss.
7.4 All our employees and data processors (i.e. those who process your personal information on our behalf, for the purposes listed above), who have access to, and are associated with the processing of personal information, are obliged to respect the confidentiality of the personal information of all users of the Site.
7.5 The importance of security for all PII associated with our users is of utmost concern to us. Your personal information is protected in several ways. We protect the information you input by undertaking the reasonable technical and administrative security measures (e.g. firewalls, data encryption, physical & administrative access controls to the data and servers) that limit the risk of loss, abuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration.
7.6 If you provide us with your credit card information, the information is encrypted using secure socket layer technology (SSL) and stored within other encryption systems. Although no method of transmission over the Internet or electronic storage is 100% secure, we follow all requirements and implement additional generally accepted industry standards.
7.7 If you make a payment to us, we use third-party payment processors such as Adyen, Bluesnap or PayPal. Payments are encrypted through the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI-DSS) or analogous systems. Your purchase transaction data is stored only as long as it is necessary to complete your purchase transaction. All direct payment gateways adhere to the standards set by PCI-DSS as managed by the PCI Security Standards Council, which is a joint effort of brands like Visa, MasterCard, American Express and Discover. PCI-DSS requirements help ensure the secure handling of credit card information by our site and related courses and its service providers.
8. User eligibility
8.1 This Website is not intended for children and we do not knowingly collect data relating to children. You must at least be eighteen (18) years of age or older to use our Website and our services. We may accept users under such age into our Services, provided, however, that they provide a valid consent proof of their parent or guardian.
8.2 We reserve the right to request any and all applicable proof of identification and consent proof from our users, at any moment, without prior notice, and at our sole and final discretion. Upon the failure to provide such proof of age, we reserve the right to immediately freeze, block or cancel the account, with no liability.
9. Amendments to this Privacy Policy
9.1 Periodically, and at our sole discretion, we may update, change, suspend and/modify or our website, our Services, this Privacy Policy and/or our Terms of Use, in whole or in part.
9.2 You should check this page occasionally to ensure you are happy with any changes to this policy. Your use after any changes indicates your acceptance thereof.
9.3 We may notify you of changes to this policy by email.
10. Notice to California Residents
10.1 Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 or CCPA, Getwebcraft and its affiliates hereto provide the following notice regarding the categories of PII that we have collected or disclosed within the preceding twelve (12) months about California residents who are not employees, independent contractors, owners, directors, officers, or job applicants of Getwebcraft, or emergency contacts or benefits beneficiaries of the foregoing.
10.2 Henceforth, the CCPA provides Californians with the following rights:
Requests for Information
You (or your authorized agent) can request a copy of your PII, including how we have collected, used, and shared your PII over the past 12 months (if any), including the categories of PII we collected and our purposes for doing so; the categories of sources for that information; the categories of third parties with whom we shared it for a business purpose and our purposes for doing so.
Your Right to Opt Out of Sales
We do not sell your PII, thus, we do not offer opt-out notices.
Your Right to Notification
Under the CCPA, we will not collect new categories of PII or use them for materially different purposes without first notifying you.
Nondiscrimination for exercising your CCPA Rights
The CCPA prohibits us from discriminating against you for exercising your rights under the law. Such discrimination may include denying services, charging different prices or rates for services, providing a different level or quality of services, or suggesting that you will receive a different level or quality of goods or services as a result of exercising your rights.
Your Right to Delete PII
You can request that we delete your PII by contacting Getwebcraft. You also can request that we delete specific information, and we will honor such requests, unless a due exception applies, such as when the information is necessary to complete a transaction, verify a fraud, review a chargeback or contract for which it was collected or when it is being used to detect, prevent, or investigate security incidents, comply with laws, identify and repair bugs or ensure another consumer’s ability to exercise their free speech rights or other rights provided by law.
Please take into consideration that we may deny your deletion request if retaining the PII is necessary for us, our affiliates, or our service providers in order to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the PII information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform our contract with you;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Debug our products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality;
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law;
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 seq.);
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us;
Comply with a legal obligation that has substantive grounds;
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
10.3 Overall, we may collect or will collect the following categories of PII from our visitors, users, and customers as necessary to fulfill our legal obligations and operational business purposes:
Personal information, as defined in the California customer records law, such as contact information and financial information;
Identifiers, such as online identifier, IP address and name;
Financial information, such as transaction information and history and securities trading information and history;
Internet or network activity information, such as browsing history and interactions with our and other websites and systems;
Geolocation data, such as device location and IP location;
Audio, electronic, visual and similar information, such as video recordings created in connection with our business activities;
Inferences drawn from any of the PII listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics.
11. Questions and Complaints
If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy policy, please feel free to contact us via email
help@getsitecontrol.com
or chat with us on our website or in the dashboard of your App.
Legal address
Klimentos 41-43, Klimentos Tower, Flat/Office 25, 1061, Nicosia, Cyprus
Date of the last effective update is August 10, 2023.